California, session 20252026, SB163.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14672.9 of the Government Code is amended to read:14672.9. (a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 14670, the Director of General Services, with the consent of the State Department of Developmental Services, may let in the best interests of the state to a nonprofit corporation, for the purposes specified in this section, real property not exceeding 45.3 acres located within the grounds of the Agnews State Hospital. Of this amount, up to 27 acres may be leased for a period not to exceed 79 years beginning in 1974 and ending July 1, 2053, for the purpose of constructing a business development park. In addition, no more than five acres, of the remaining acres, required by the local government agency for offsite improvements and roadways to support the business development park, may be leased for a period not to exceed 79 years beginning in 1974 and ending July 1, 2053. The remaining acres shall be leased for a period not to exceed 50 years beginning in 1974 and ending on July 1, 2024, for the purpose of conducting an educational and work program for developmentally disabled and other handicapped persons. In the event the nonprofit corporation fails to substantially commence construction of the business development park by July 1, 1988, the terms of the lease allowing construction of a business development park and roadways and offsite improvements shall be null and void, and the lease shall revert to a 50-year period terminating July 1, 2024.The(2) The Department of General Services may provide a one-year extension to the deadline for commencement of construction if the department determines the nonprofit corporation has reasonable grounds for failure to commence construction.(b) The lease authorized by this section shall be subject to periodic review every five years. The review shall require submission of a report every five years by the lessee. The report shall be reviewed by the Director of General Services, who shall assure the state that the original purposes of the lease are being carried out.(c) Subject to the approval of the Director of General Services and the State Department of Developmental Services, a lease executed under subdivision (a) may be revised to provide any of the following:(1) That the nonprofit corporation may assign its interest in the leased property, in whole or in part.(2) That the nonprofit corporation may sublet all or any portion of the leased property.(3) That the nonprofit corporation may enter into joint ventures with any other person, firm, partnership, or corporation to construct facilities or to conduct programs and activities on the leased property.(d) Any revision of the nonprofit corporation’s lease pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be subject to the requirement that all activities, assignments, and subleases shall be in furtherance of the purposes specified in subdivision (a).(e) Any sublease or partial assignment or transfer of the nonprofit corporation’s interest in the leased property, whether voluntary, involuntary, or by operation of law, shall not terminate the nonprofit corporation’s remaining interest in the leased property.(f) In addition to rent paid by the nonprofit corporation to the state, the nonprofit corporation shall pay the state 50 percent of the gross rental income resulting from any subleases pursuant to subdivision (c) through June 30, 2024, and 75 percent of the gross rental income from July 1, 2024, to July 1, 2053. Any proceeds received by the state shall be deposited in a special account within the General Fund to be known as the Developmental Disabilities Services Account. All funds within this account shall be held without regard to fiscal years and shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature for the benefit of persons with developmental disabilities. Any interest accruing to moneys deposited in the account also shall accrue to the account.On or before April 15 of each year beginning in 1987, the State Department of Developmental Services shall submit a report to the Assembly Ways and Means Committee and the Senate Appropriations Committee. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:(1)The amount of funds in the Developmental Disabilities Services Account in the General Fund.(2)The department’s priorities for expenditure of those funds.(g) Any profits to the nonprofit corporation from the proceeds of a sublease executed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall be directed into programs for persons with disabilities for the purpose of directly benefiting clients of the nonprofit corporation.(h) A minimum of 15 percent of the total number of jobs created as a result of the sublease shall be reserved for handicapped employees and placed by the nonprofit corporation.(i) (1) Moneys in the Developmental Disabilities Services Account shall be expended by the State Department of Developmental Services, through a request for proposals process, for projects that expand the availability of affordable housing for persons with developmental disabilities, including housing for funding developers in nonprofit housing development corporations or coalitions with expertise in the housing needs of persons with developmental disabilities.(2) Prior to the expenditure of funds under this subdivision, the department shall consult with stakeholder groups, as designated by the State Department of Developmental Services, in ranking proposals and awarding funds. At least one project shall be located on the site previously known as the West Campus of Agnews Developmental Center. Funds shall not be awarded pursuant to this subdivision to a regional center for the development or management of housing projects or to fund regional center staff required in subdivision (c) of Section 4640.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(3) On or before April 15 of each year, the State Department of Developmental Services shall submit a report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature on the implementation of this subdivision. The report shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:(1)(A) A description of projects funded in the previous year.(2)(B) A description of the process used to select projects, including the criteria used in their selection and the stakeholder groups that were consulted as part of that process.SEC. 2. Section 15432 of the Government Code is amended to read:15432. As used in this part, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings, unless the context clearly indicates or requires another or different meaning or intent:(a) “Act” means the California Health Facilities Financing Authority Act.(b) “Authority” means the California Health Facilities Financing Authority created by this part or any board, body, commission, department, or officer succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to which the powers conferred upon the authority by this part shall be given by law.(c) “Cost,” as applied to a project or portion of a project financed under this part, means and includes all or any part of the cost of construction and acquisition of all lands, structures, real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and interests acquired or used for a project, the cost of demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which those buildings or structures may be moved, the cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, interest prior to, during, and for a period not to exceed the later of one year or one year following completion of construction, as determined by the authority, the cost of insurance during construction, the cost of funding or financing noncapital expenses, reserves for principal and interest and for extensions, enlargements, additions, replacements, renovations, and improvements, the cost of engineering, service contracts, reasonable financial and legal services, plans, specifications, studies, surveys, estimates, administrative expenses, and other expenses of funding or financing, that are necessary or incident to determining the feasibility of constructing any project, or that are incident to the construction, acquisition, or financing of any project.(d) “Health facility” means a facility, place, or building that is licensed, accredited, or certified and organized, maintained, and operated for the diagnosis, care, prevention, and treatment of human illness, or physical, mental, or developmental disability, including convalescence and rehabilitation and including care during and after pregnancy, or for any one or more of these purposes, for one or more persons, and includes, but is not limited to, all of the following types:(1) A general acute care hospital that is a health facility having a duly constituted governing body with overall administrative and professional responsibility and an organized medical staff that provides 24-hour inpatient care, including the following basic services: medical, nursing, surgical, anesthesia, laboratory, radiology, pharmacy, and dietary services.(2) An acute psychiatric hospital that is a health facility having a duly constituted governing body with overall administrative and professional responsibility and an organized medical staff that provides 24-hour inpatient care for mentally disordered, incompetent, or other patients referred to in Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000) or Division 6 (commencing with Section 6000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code, including the following basic services: medical, nursing, rehabilitative, pharmacy, and dietary services.(3) A skilled nursing facility that is a health facility that provides the following basic services: skilled nursing care and supportive care to patients whose primary need is for availability of skilled nursing care on an extended basis.(4) An intermediate care facility that is a health facility that provides the following basic services: inpatient care to ambulatory or semiambulatory patients who have recurring need for skilled nursing supervision and need supportive care, but who do not require availability or continuous skilled nursing care.(5) A special health care facility that is a health facility having a duly constituted governing body with overall administrative and professional responsibility and an organized medical or dental staff that provides inpatient or outpatient, acute or nonacute care, including, but not limited to, medical, nursing, rehabilitation, dental, or maternity.(6) A clinic that is operated by a tax-exempt nonprofit corporation that is licensed pursuant to Section 1204 or 1204.1 of the Health and Safety Code or a clinic exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.(7) An adult day health center that is a facility, as defined under subdivision (b) of Section 1570.7 of the Health and Safety Code, that provides adult day health care, as defined under subdivision (a) of Section 1570.7 of the Health and Safety Code.(8) A facility owned or operated by a local jurisdiction for the provision of county health services.(9) A multilevel facility is an institutional arrangement where a residential care facility for the elderly is operated as a part of, or in conjunction with, an intermediate care facility, a skilled nursing facility, or a general acute care hospital. For purposes of this paragraph, “elderly” means a person 60 years of age or older.(10) A child daycare facility operated in conjunction with a health facility. A child daycare facility is a facility, as defined in Section 1596.750 of the Health and Safety Code. For purposes of this paragraph, “child” means a minor from birth to 18 years of age.(11) An intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled habilitative that is a health facility, as defined under subdivision (e) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.(12) An intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-nursing that is a health facility, as defined under subdivision (h) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.(13) A community care facility that is a facility, as defined under subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, that provides care, habilitation, rehabilitation, or treatment services to developmentally disabled or mentally impaired persons.(14) A nonprofit community care facility, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, other than a facility that, as defined in that subdivision, is a foster family agency, a foster family home, a full service adoption agency, or a noncustodial adoption agency.(15) A nonprofit accredited community work activity program, as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 4851 and Section 4856 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(16) A community mental health center, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 5667 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(17) A nonprofit speech and hearing center, as defined in Section 1201.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(18) A blood bank, as defined in Section 1600.2 of the Health and Safety Code, licensed pursuant to Section 1602.5 of the Health and Safety Code, and exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.(19) A residential facility for persons with developmental disabilities, as defined in Sections 4688.5 and 4688.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, which includes, but is not limited to, a community care facility licensed pursuant to Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code and a family teaching home as defined in Section 4689.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(20) (A) A residential care facility for the elderly, as defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) This paragraph shall not be construed as affecting the licensing of health facilities under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, or any other provisions relating to health facilities, except as the term “health facility” is interpreted for purposes of the California Health Facilities Financing Authority Act under this part. The designation of a residential care facility for the elderly as a health facility, as made pursuant to this paragraph, shall apply to this part only.(21) A nonpublic school that provides educational services in conjunction with a health facility, as defined in paragraphs (1) to (20), inclusive, that otherwise qualifies for financing pursuant to this part, if the nonpublic school is certified pursuant to Sections 56366 and 56366.1 of the Education Code as meeting standards relating to the required special education and specified related services and facilities for individuals with physical, mental, or developmental disabilities.“Health facility” includes a clinic that is described in subdivision (l) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.“Health facility” includes information systems equipment and the following facilities, if the equipment and facility is operated in conjunction with or to support the services provided in one or more of the facilities specified in paragraphs (1) to (21), inclusive, of this subdivision: a laboratory, laundry, a nurses or interns residence, housing for staff or employees and their families or patients or relatives of patients, a physicians’ facility, an administration building, a research facility, a maintenance, storage, or utility facility, an information systems facility, all structures or facilities related to any of the foregoing facilities or required or useful for the operation of a health facility and the necessary and usual attendant and related facilities and equipment, and parking and supportive service facilities or structures required or useful for the orderly conduct of the health facility.“Health facility” does not include any institution, place, or building used or to be used primarily for sectarian instruction or study or as a place for devotional activities or religious worship.(e) “Participating health institution” means a city, city and county, or county, a district hospital, or a private nonprofit corporation or association, or a limited liability company whose sole member is a nonprofit corporation or association authorized by the laws of this state to provide or operate a health facility or a nonprofit corporation that controls or manages, is controlled or managed by, is under common control or management with, or is affiliated with any of the foregoing, and that, pursuant to this part, undertakes the financing or refinancing of the construction or acquisition of a project or of working capital as provided in this part. “Participating health institution” also includes, for purposes of the California Health Facilities Revenue Bonds (UCSF-Stanford Health Care) 1998 Series A, the Regents of the University of California.(f) “Project” means construction, expansion, remodeling, renovation, furnishing, or equipping, or funding, financing, or refinancing of a health facility or acquisition of a health facility to be financed or refinanced with funds provided in whole or in part pursuant to this part. “Project” may include reimbursement for the costs of construction, expansion, remodeling, renovation, furnishing, or equipping, or funding, financing, or refinancing of a health facility or acquisition of a health facility. “Project” may include any combination of one or more of the foregoing undertaken jointly by any participating health institution with one or more other participating health institutions.(g) “Revenue bond” or “bond” means a bond, warrant, note, lease, or installment sale obligation that is evidenced by a certificate of participation or other evidence of indebtedness issued by the authority.(h) “Working capital” means moneys to be used by, or on behalf of, a participating health institution to pay or prepay maintenance or operation expenses or any other costs that would be treated as an expense item, under generally accepted accounting principles, in connection with the ownership or operation of a health facility, including, but not limited to, reserves for maintenance or operation expenses, interest on any loan for working capital made pursuant to this part, and reserves for debt service with respect to, and any costs necessary or incidental to, that financing.SEC. 3. Section 95007 of the Government Code is amended to read:95007. The State Department of Developmental Services shall serve as the lead agency responsible for administration and coordination of the statewide system. The specific duties and responsibilities of the State Department of Developmental Services shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(a) Establishing a single point of contact with the federal Office of Special Education Programs for the administration of Part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.(b) Administering the state early intervention system in accordance with Part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1431 et seq.), applicable regulations, and an approved state application.(c) Administering mandatory and discretionary components as specified in Sections 95022 and 95024.(d) Administering fiscal arrangements and interagency agreements with participating agencies and community-based organizations to implement this title.(e) (1)Establishing interagency procedures, including the designation of local coordinating structures, as are necessary to share agency information and to coordinate policymaking activities. In developing these procedures, efforts shall be made to schedule meetings with, and engage parents and legal guardians in, transition-related activities.(2)Require each regional center to designate a main point of contact for coordinating and completing, with other agencies and persons, the transition of a child and family from Part C to Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, including establishing practices to educate and support families during transition.(f) Adopting written procedures for receiving and resolving complaints regarding violations of Part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act by public agencies covered under this title, as specified in Section 1435(a)(10) of Title 20 of the United States Code and appropriate federal regulations.(g) Establishing, adopting, and implementing procedural safeguards that comply with the requirements of Part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, as specified in Section 1439 of Title 20 of the United States Code and appropriate federal regulations.(h) (1) Monitoring of agencies, institutions, and organizations receiving assistance under this title.(2) Monitoring shall be conducted by interagency teams that are sufficiently trained to ensure compliance. Interagency teams shall consist of, but not be limited to, representatives from the State Department of Developmental Services, the State Department of Education, the interagency coordinating council, or a local family resource center or network, parent, direct service provider, or any other agency responsible for providing early intervention services.(3) All members of an interagency team shall have access to all information that is subject to review. Members of each interagency team shall maintain the confidentiality of the information, and each member of the interagency team shall sign a written agreement of confidentiality.(4) A summary of monitoring issues and findings shall be forwarded biannually to the interagency coordinating council for review.(i) Establishing innovative approaches to information distribution, family support services, and interagency coordination at the local level. This shall include the posting of information for parents specific to transition requirements along with other parent training opportunities on the lead agency’s internet website, the regional centers’ websites, and other appropriate internet websites.(j) Ensuring the provision of appropriate early intervention services to all infants eligible under Part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1431 et seq.) and under Section 95014, except for those infants who have solely a low incidence disability as defined in Section 56026.5 of the Education Code and who are not eligible for services under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code).The development and implementation of subdivisions (e) to (h), inclusive, shall be a collaborative effort between the State Department of Developmental Services and the State Department of Education. In establishing the written procedures for receiving and resolving complaints as specified in subdivision (f) and in establishing and implementing procedural safeguards as specified in subdivision (g), it is the intent of the Legislature that these procedures be identical for all infants served under this act and shall be in accordance with Sections 303.400 and 303.420(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The procedural safeguards and due process requirements established under this title shall replace and be used in lieu of due process procedures contained in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4500) of Division 4.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and Part 30 (commencing with Section 56500) of the Education Code for infants and their families eligible under this title.(k) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, and as a condition to receive federal Part C grant funds, the State Department of Developmental Services may issue directives to local educational agencies and regional centers operating programs under this title until updated regulations are adopted, which shall occur no later than June 30, 2029.The department may collaborate(2) The State Department of Education shall collaborate with the State Department of Education to develop and disseminate Department of Developmental Services as the State Department of Developmental Services develops and disseminates written directives related to transition services in practices between Part C and under Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.(l) The requirements set forth in this title shall be interpreted and implemented in a manner consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.SEC. 4. Section 95008 of the Government Code is amended to read:95008. (a)The State Department of Education shall be responsible for administering services and programs for infants with solely visual, hearing, and severe orthopedic impairments, and any combination thereof, who meet the criteria in Sections 56026 and 56026.5 of the Education Code, and in Section 3030(a), (b), (d), or (e) of, and Section 3031 of, Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and Part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1431 et seq.) and who are not eligible for services under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code).(b)The State Department of Education shall require each local educational agency to designate a main point of contact for coordinating and completing, with other agencies and persons, the transition of a child and family from Part C to Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, including establishing practices to educate and support families during transition.SEC. 5. Section 95012 of the Government Code is amended to read:95012. (a) The following departments shall cooperate and coordinate their early intervention services for eligible infants and their families under this title, and need to collaborate with families and communities, to provide a family-centered, comprehensive, multidisciplinary, interagency, community-based early intervention system:(1) State Department of Developmental Services.(2) State Department of Education.(3) State Department of Health Care Services.(4) State Department of Social Services.(b) Each participating department shall enter into an interagency agreement with the State Department of Developmental Services. Each interagency agreement shall specify, at a minimum, the agency’s current and continuing level of financial participation in providing services to infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families. Each interagency agreement shall also specify procedures for resolving disputes in a timely manner. Interagency agreements shall also contain provisions for ensuring effective cooperation and coordination among agencies concerning policymaking activities associated with the implementation of this title, including legislative proposals, regulation development, and fiscal planning. All interagency agreements shall be reviewed annually and revised as necessary.(c)In addition to the provisions specified in subdivision (b), the interagency agreement with the State Department of Education shall include provisions related to the joint development and dissemination of educational information about transitioning from Part C of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.SEC. 6. Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 95013) is added to Title 14 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 3.1. Transition to Preschool and Other Programs95013. The requirements set forth in this chapter shall be interpreted and implemented in a manner consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act. In order to comply with the federal regulations in Section 303.209 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations and to facilitate a seamless transition between services in Part C and under Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), the State Department of Education, as the state education agency, shall enter into an interagency agreement with the State Department of Developmental Services which shall include provisions that address both of the following:(a) Federal requirements consistent with Section 303.209(a)(3) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(b) The joint development and dissemination of educational information about transitioning from Part C to Part B.95013.1. In the transition of a child and family from Part C to Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act:(a) Each regional center shall designate a main point of contact for coordinating and completing the transition with other agencies and persons, including establishing practices to educate and support families during transition.(b) The State Department of Education shall require each local educational agency to designate a main point of contact for coordinating and completing the transition with other agencies and persons.95013.2. In providing services pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 95024, resources shall be made available by the lead agency or the agency’s contractor or both to families with information on the following areas:(a) The difference between Part B and Part C services.(b) Information about local Part B programs and other services in a family’s community.(c) Options for services for families after their child reaches three years of age.(d) An overview of the process and timelines for a child’s transition at three years of age.95013.3. It is the regional center’s responsibility to do both of the following:(a) Assess a toddler who qualifies for early intervention services from the regional center pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 4512 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(b) Provide information about available community or preschool programs, including California state preschool programs, as defined in Section 8207 of the Education Code, for toddlers transitioning out of Part C services.SEC. 7. Section 95024 of the Government Code is amended to read:95024. (a) Any increased cost to local educational agencies due to the implementation of this title shall be funded from the Part C federal funds provided for the purposes of this title.(b) Any increased costs to regional centers due to the implementation of this title shall be funded from the Part C federal funds provided for the purposes of this title.(c) The annual Budget Act shall specify the amount of federal Part C funds allocated for local assistance and for state operations individually, for the State Department of Developmental Services, and for the State Department of Education.(d) If federal funds are available after mandatory components and increased costs in subdivisions (a) and (b), if any, are funded, the lead agency, in consultation with the State Department of Education, may do the following:(1) Designate local interagency coordination areas throughout the state and allocate available Part C federal funds to fund interagency coordination activities, including, but not limited to, outreach and public awareness, and interagency approaches to service planning and delivery. If the lead agency chooses to designate and fund local interagency coordination areas, the lead agency shall first offer to enter into a contract with the regional center or a local educational agency. If the regional center or any of the local educational agencies do not accept the offer, the lead agency, in consultation with the State Department of Education and the approval of the regional center and local educational agencies in the area, directly may enter into a contract with a private, nonprofit organization. Nothing in this section shall preclude a regional center or local educational agency that enters into a contract with the lead agency from subcontracting with a private, nonprofit organization.(2) Allocate funds to support family resource services, including, but not limited to, parent-to-parent support, information dissemination and referral, public awareness, family-professional collaboration activities, and transition assistance for families. In providing these services, resources shall be made available to families with information on the following areas:(A)The difference between Part B and Part C services.(B)Information about local Part B programs and other services in a family’s community.(C)Options for services for families after their child reaches three years of age.(D)An overview of the process and timelines for a child’s transition at three years of age.(e) If an expenditure plan is developed under subdivision (d), the lead agency, in consultation with the State Department of Education, shall give high priority to funding family resource services.(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the lead agency’s authority, in consultation with the State Department of Education, to allocate discretionary Part C federal funds for any legitimate purpose consistent with the statutes and regulations under Part C (20 U.S.C. Secs. 1431 to 1444, inclusive) and this title.SEC. 8. Section 10295 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:10295. (a) All contracts entered into by any state agency for (1) the acquisition of goods or elementary school textbooks, (2) services, whether or not the services involve the furnishing or use of goods or are performed by an independent contractor, (3) the construction, alteration, improvement, repair, or maintenance of property, real or personal, or (4) the performance of work or services by the state agency for or in cooperation with any person, or public body, are void unless and until approved by the department. Every contract shall be transmitted with all papers, estimates, and recommendations concerning it to the department and, if approved by the department, shall be effective from the date of the approval.(b) This section applies to a state agency that by general or specific statute is expressly or impliedly authorized to enter into transactions referred to in this section.(c) This section does not apply to any of the following:(1) A transaction entered into by the Trustees of the California State University, by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, or by a department under the State Contract Act or the California State University Contract Law.(2) A contract of a type specifically mentioned and authorized to be entered into by the Department of Transportation under Section 14035 or 14035.5 of the Government Code, Sections 99316 to 99319, inclusive, of the Public Utilities Code, or the Streets and Highways Code.(3) A contract entered into by the Department of Transportation that is not funded by money derived by state tax sources but, rather, is funded by money derived from federal or local tax sources.(4) A contract entered into by the Department of Human Resources for state employee benefits, occupational health and safety, training services, or combination thereof.(5) A contract let by the Legislature.(6) A contract entered into under the authority of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11770) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.(7) A contract entered into by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for the purpose of providing logistical support for large-scale prescribed fire operations, including, but not limited to, meals, lodging, hired equipment, onsite preparatory efforts, and land use agreements, or any related subcontract.(8) A letter, contract, or contract amendment issued or entered into by the State Department of Developmental Services for a funding allocation or adjustment to a regional center pursuant to Section 4621.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.SEC. 9. Section 4418.05 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:4418.05. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide individuals served in facilities operated by the department with prompt access to essential goods and services and provide continuity of care by authorizing direct care purchases.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, for facilities operated by the department, the department may make direct care purchases in individual amounts of less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year. The dollar amount limit shall be adjusted every July 1 thereafter for that fiscal year by the most recently available changes in the California Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the Department of Finance.(c) Direct care purchases made pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the procurement requirements contained in the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual, and from approval by the Department of General Services.(d) The department shall establish and maintain a written policy and procedures manual to guide the implementation of this section. The manual shall include, but not be limited to, appropriate oversight, internal controls, and the provision of public transparency through the Financial Information System for California (FI$Cal), or other reporting system.(e) For purposes of this section, “direct care purchase” means a good or service necessary for an individual’s health, safety, or continuity of care. These purchases may include, but are not limited to, prescription and medical copayments, pharmacy supplies, over-the-counter health products, nutritional supplements, treatment programs, lodging expenses, groceries and food, clothing, personal hygiene materials, furniture, home goods, educational and technology devices and services for the use of individuals receiving care, and fitness and recreational equipment.SEC. 10. Section 4429 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4429. (a) The department shall biennially report to the Legislature its acts and proceedings for the two years ending the June 30th last preceding, with such facts regarding the management of the institution for the developmentally disabled as it deems necessary for the information of the Legislature, including estimates of the amounts required for the use of such hospitals and the reasons therefor, and including annual reports for each state hospital.(b) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.SEC. 11. Section 4430 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4430. (a) The department shall report to the Legislature the prospective needs for the care, custody, and treatment of developmentally disabled persons, together with its recommendations therefor. For the purpose of preventing overcrowding, it shall recommend such plans for the development of additional medical facilities as, in its judgment, will best meet the requirements of such persons.(b) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.SEC. 12. Section 4435.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4435.1. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide more statewide uniformity and consistency and promote equity in the administrative practices and services of regional centers, consistent with the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)), as specified in this section.(b) (1) No later than June 30, 2024, the department shall establish common data definitions that shall be used to promote service access and equity in all regional center services and programs. No later than January 1, 2025, regional centers shall start recording the race and ethnicity and preferred language identified by each individual, subject to paragraph (4), at the time of initial intake, assessment, and the individual program plan meeting following the individual’s 18th birthday. Individuals have the right to update their demographic information at any time.(2) The categories for race and ethnicity shall be based on the latest categories adopted by the United States Core Data for Interoperability set forth by the United States Office of the National Coordinator for Health Information Technology.(3) “Preferred language” means the language chosen by the applicant or individual, or, when appropriate, the individual’s parent, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative.(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to This section does not compel an individual, their parent, their legal guardian or conservator, or their authorized representative to provide requested information regarding the race, ethnicity, or preferred language of any of those persons.(5) The data requirements described in this subdivision shall be integrated with the department’s new case management system. Life Outcomes Improvement System (LOIS), as established pursuant to Section 4519.1.(c) (1) No later than June 30, 2025, the department shall establish standardized processes, including standardized templates, for assessing a consumer’s need for respite services. Regional centers shall implement these standardized processes no later than January 1, 2026.(2) The processes shall include a requirement that the regional center obtain information about respite needs from family members and, when appropriate, from other caregivers. The information obtained from these standardized processes shall be considered by the individual’s individual program planning team.(3) Regional centers shall make any modifications to their purchase-of-service policies as necessary for implementation of this subdivision.(d) No later than June 30, 2024, the department shall establish a standardized individual program plan template and standardized procedures, including frequency of meetings, that are consistent with person-centered services planning requirements. The template shall be integrated with the department’s new case management system. LOIS. Regional centers shall implement the standardized individual program plan template and procedures no later than January 1, 2025.(e) (1) No later than June 30, 2025, the department shall establish standardized vendorization procedures. These procedures may include, but are not limited to, standardized vendorization forms and requirements to streamline vendorization elements, including when services are provided through more than one regional center. Regional centers shall implement these standardized vendorization procedures and provide updated vendor lists to the department on a quarterly basis no later than January 1, 2026.(2) No later than March 1, 2028, in consultation with stakeholders, the department shall issue guidance to regional centers on maintaining necessary quality assurance oversight of service providers, special incident reporting, provider directory structure, and rate controls while removing barriers to statewide accessibility of services, including ending the practice and process currently known as courtesy vendorization. Service providers shall give preference to providing services to individuals served by the service provider’s initially vendorizing regional center. This section does not require a regional center to refer individuals to any specific service provider (f) (1) No later than January 1, 2025, the department shall establish a standardized intake process consistent with the requirements and timelines specified in Section 4642.(2) No later than June 30, 2025, and to the extent allowed by current data systems, regional centers shall report to the department, quarterly as described in paragraph (4), the number of assessments and the length of time that it took to determine eligibility.(3) The department shall include all of the following information in its new case management system: LOIS:(A) The number of individuals for whom intake was requested.(B) The outcome of that intake, including whether an assessment was determined to be necessary.(C) The length of time that it took to complete the assessment.(D) The number of notices of action sent pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 4642.(4) Regional centers shall report the data described in this subdivision to the department on a quarterly basis, based on the criteria specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 4519.5.(g) The department shall develop the standardized processes specified in this section with input from stakeholders, including consumers and families, who reflect the demographic diversity of California, to the extent practicable. In developing the standardized processes specified in this section, the department shall address barriers that may impact access to services.(h) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section through written directives until regulations are effective.(i) As part of its quarterly updates to the Legislature pursuant to Section 4474.17, the department shall provide information on the status of implementation of this section.SEC. 13. Section 4435.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4435.2. (a) No later than July 1, 2025, the department, with input from stakeholders, including consumers and families, relevant state agencies, and other entities overseeing benefits or services considered generic services by regional centers, including representatives of the State Department of Education, the Department of Rehabilitation, the State Department of Social Services, and the State Department of Health Care Services, shall provide all of the following information to the Legislature in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code:(1) A definition of generic services.(2) Options to improve coordination of generic services for individuals and families.(3) A description of regional center efforts to coordinate generic services for individuals and families.(4) Identified barriers to accessing generic services.(b) The department shall explore the feasibility of including the functionality in its new case management system the Life Outcomes Improvement System (LOIS), as established pursuant to Section 4519.1, to track utilization of generic services. This functionality shall be used to the extent that data are available.(c) (1) The department shall, with input from stakeholders, including consumers and families, evaluate the availability of common services and supports that individuals served by regional centers can access when determined necessary by their individual program planning team or their individualized family service plan team.(2) The department shall evaluate these common services and supports for all of the following:(A) Inconsistencies in the availability of services or supports across the state.(B) Availability of services or supports based on the preferred language of consumers.(C) Recommendations for addressing inconsistencies, including data collection and related infrastructure requirements that may be necessary to analyze service or support use patterns.(3) By January 10, 2025, the department shall provide a status update on efforts to complete the evaluation described in this subdivision and a projected date for completing the evaluation.(d) As part of its quarterly updates to the Legislature pursuant to Section 4474.17, the department shall provide information on the status of implementation of this section.SEC. 14. Section 4474.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4474.1. (a) Whenever the State Department of Developmental Services proposes the closure of a state developmental center, the department shall be required to submit a detailed plan to the Legislature not later than April 1 immediately prior to the fiscal year in which the plan is to be implemented, and as a part of the Governor’s proposed budget. A plan submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this section, including any modifications made pursuant to subdivision (b), shall not be implemented without the approval of the Legislature.(b) A plan submitted on or before April 1 immediately prior to the fiscal year in which the plan is to be implemented may be subsequently modified during the legislative review process.(c) Prior to submission of the plan to the Legislature, the department shall solicit input from the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, the Association of Regional Center Agencies, the protection and advocacy agency specified in Section 4901, the local regional center, consumers living in the developmental center, parents, family members, guardians, and conservators of persons living in the developmental centers or their representative organizations, persons with developmental disabilities living in the community, developmental center employees and employee organizations, community care providers, the affected city and county governments, and business and civic organizations, as may be recommended by local state Senate and Assembly representatives.(d) Prior to the submission of the plan to the Legislature, the department shall confer with the county in which the developmental center is located, the regional centers served by the developmental center, and other state departments using similar occupational classifications, to develop a program for the placement of staff of the developmental center planned for closure in other developmental centers, as positions become vacant, or in similar positions in programs operated by, or through contract with, the county, regional centers, or other state departments, including, but not limited to, the community state staff program, use of state staff for mobile health and crisis teams in the community, and use of state staff in new state-operated models that may be developed as a component of the closure plan.(e) Prior to the submission of the plan to the Legislature, the department shall confer with the county in which the developmental center is located, and shall consider recommendations for the use of the developmental center property.(f) Prior to the submission of the plan to the Legislature, the department shall hold at least one public hearing in the community in which the developmental center is located, with public comment from that hearing summarized in the plan.(g) The plan submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall include all of the following:(1) A description of the land and buildings at the developmental center.(2) A description of existing lease arrangements at the developmental center.(3) A description of resident characteristics, including, but not limited to, age, gender, ethnicity, family involvement, years of developmental center residency, developmental disability, and other factors that will determine service and support needs.(4) A description of stakeholder input provided pursuant to subdivisions (c), (d), and (e), including a description of local issues, concerns, and recommendations regarding the proposed closure, and alternative uses of the developmental center property.(5) The impact on residents and their families.(6) A description of the unique and specialized services provided by the developmental center, including, but not limited to, crisis facilities, health and dental clinics, and adaptive technology services.(7) A description of the assessment process and community placement decision process that will ensure necessary services and supports are in place prior to a resident transitioning into the community.(8) Anticipated alternative placements for residents.(9) A description of how the department will transition the client rights advocacy contract provided at the developmental center pursuant to Section 4433 to the community.(10) A description of how the well-being of the residents will be monitored during and following their transition into the community.(11) The impact on regional center services.(12) Where services will be obtained that, upon closure of the developmental center, will no longer be provided by that facility.(13) A description of the potential job opportunities for developmental center employees, activities the department will undertake to support employees through the closure process, and other efforts made to mitigate the effect of the closure on employees.(14) The fiscal impact of the closure.(15) The timeframe in which closure will be accomplished.(h) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.SEC. 15. Section 4474.12 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4474.12. (a) The department shall seek to modify the contract in existence on January 1, 2017, for the conduct of a movers longitudinal study to include all of the following:(1) A requirement that at least 250 individuals who meet the following criteria participate in the study:(A) Volunteered to participate in the study.(B) Proportionately selected from among individuals who have moved into the community from Sonoma Developmental Center, Fairview Developmental Center, or Porterville Developmental Center.(C) Proportionately selected from among individuals who have moved into the community at different stages of the closure process.(2) A requirement that the study follow a sample of individuals described in paragraph (1) for a two-year period after the individual moves into the community from the developmental center.(3) A requirement that the study include individuals who move into the community from a developmental center during the first year of the study, and during each subsequent year of the study, until the developmental centers identified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) close.(4) A requirement that researchers conducting the study meet with each individual participating in the study at intervals of three months, six months, one year, and two years following the person’s move into the community from the developmental center to discuss the individual’s quality of life and services and supports.(b) The movers longitudinal study described in this section is one element of the quality assurance instrument required pursuant to Section 4571.(c) (1) For purposes of conducting the study, the department shall maintain and update the addresses of, and contact information for, former residents of the centers who relocated as a result of the closure of the centers.(2) The department shall ensure, to the extent permitted by law, that researchers conducting the study have access to data and other information necessary to conduct the study, including the addresses of, and contact information for, former residents of the centers who relocated due to the closure of the centers.(d) The department shall annually submit interim reports to the Legislature regarding the study in accordance with the requirements of Section 9795 of the Government Code. The reports shall include information about consumer and family satisfaction and adequacy of community services. Upon the completion of the study as described in subdivision (a), the department shall submit the study to the Legislature, in accordance with the requirements of Section 9795 of the Government Code.(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.SEC. 16. Section 4474.15 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4474.15. (a) The State Department of Developmental Services shall include an update to the Legislature in the 2017–18 May Revision regarding how the department will provide access to crisis services after the closure of a developmental center and how the state will maintain its role in providing residential services to those whom private sector vendors cannot or will not serve. As part of this plan, the department shall assess the option of expanding the community state staff program authorized in Section 4474.2 to allow the department’s employees to serve as regional crisis management teams that provide assessment, consultation, and resolution for persons with developmental disabilities in crisis in the community.(b) The State Department of Developmental Services shall post on its Internet Web site a monthly progress report regarding the development of residential capacity by each regional center. The report shall include information on monthly targets for individuals moving out of a developmental center based on transition activities and community resource development activities by each regional center. The report shall also provide an explanation of any targets that have not been met.(c) Commencing July 1, 2017, and until December 31, 2020, the State Department of Developmental Services shall provide quarterly updates to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on the steps foreseen, planned, and completed in the development of services under the department’s update to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (a), including any planned services or residences intended to facilitate transitions or diversions from institutes for mental disease, or other restrictive settings in the community, or the secure treatment program at Porterville Developmental Center. These updates may be made in conjunction with planned quarterly updates on closure activities for developmental centers.(d) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (a) is inoperative on January 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.SEC. 17. Section 4474.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4474.2. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may operate any facility, provide its employees to assist in the operation of any facility, or provide other necessary services and supports if, in the discretion of the department, it determines that the activity will assist in meeting the goal of successfully transitioning developmental center residents to community living or deflecting the admission of individuals with developmental disabilities to a developmental center, an institution for mental disease, an out-of-state placement, a general acute care hospital, or an acute psychiatric hospital. The department may contract with any entity for the use of the department’s employees to provide services and supports in furtherance of this goal.(b) The department shall prepare a report on the use of the department’s employees in providing services in the community pursuant to this section. The report shall include data on the number and classification of state employees working in the community program. The report shall include recommendations on whether the program should be continued or ways in which the program may be improved. Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the report shall be submitted with the Governor’s proposed budget for the 2015–16 fiscal year to the fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature and annually thereafter.(c) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.SEC. 18. Section 4474.2 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:4474.2. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may operate any facility, provide its employees to assist in the operation of any facility, or provide other necessary services and supports if, in the discretion of the department, it determines that the activity will assist in meeting the goal of successfully transitioning developmental center residents to community living or deflecting the admission of individuals with developmental disabilities to a developmental center, an institution for mental disease, an out-of-state placement, a general acute care hospital, or an acute psychiatric hospital. The department may contract with any entity for the use of the department’s employees to provide services and supports in furtherance of this goal.(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.SEC. 19. Section 4519.1 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:4519.1. (a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to modernize the department’s financial and case management information technology systems for use by regional centers through the development and implementation of the Life Outcomes Improvement System (LOIS). LOIS shall serve as the system used by all regional centers to improve the user experience, promote access, and manage eligibility and services for individuals and families who are applying for or receiving regional center services.(2) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(A) LOIS is intended to provide a more consistent statewide experience for individuals and families, regional centers, and service providers.(B) LOIS is intended to enable individuals, families, and service providers to access and update their own information.(C) LOIS is intended to simplify the complexity of information technology support needs for the delivery of developmental services and eliminate costly duplications and redundancies and data reconciliation and transfers.(D) LOIS is intended to enable more robust, timely, complete, and consistent data collection, reporting, and analysis capabilities, enabling better management of regional centers, services to individuals and families, and improved information for oversight, monitoring, and policymaking.(b) For purposes of this section, LOIS constitutes an “enterprise system,” as defined in Section 7922.700 of the Government Code.(c) Beginning July 1, 2026, regional centers shall do all of the following to prepare for and assist the transition from their existing information technology systems to LOIS:(1) Notify the department of any plans to permit or actions permitting third-party applications or information technology systems to access data of any of the following:(A) Individuals applying for or receiving regional center services, and their families.(B) Service provider information.(C) Financial information.(D) Regional center operations.(2) Notify the department of any plans to use any new information technology systems that will do either of the following:(A) Collect, retain, or transmit information described in paragraph (1).(B) Replicate, enhance, or replace the existing functionality of existing systems.(3) Prohibit both the transitioning of, or planning the transition of, any existing case management system, such as SANDIS, Virtual Chart, SmartChart, KEA, Atlas, and Atticus, to solutions other than LOIS, without prior written approval from the department.(4) Prioritize data cleanup and other transitional activities necessary to prepare for the implementation of LOIS, as directed by the department.(d) Upon readiness of LOIS for implementation, each regional center shall discontinue the use of all other case management and financial technology systems, following instructions from the department. The transition to implementation of LOIS shall be designed and implemented to minimize disruptions for individuals and families and regional center operations.(e) Beginning July 1, 2026, and until completion of planning for LOIS, the department shall submit quarterly written updates to both the relevant budget subcommittees and policy committees of each house of the Legislature, as well as the Legislative Analyst’s Office, on the planning for LOIS. The written updates shall include a plain language description of progress towards the implementation of LOIS that includes, but is not limited to, all the following:(1) The most recent estimated cost and schedule of LOIS. If, at the time of an update, the department has not completed the Stage 2 Alternatives Analysis of the Project Approval Lifecycle (PAL) process, the department shall provide the “rough order of magnitude” estimate included in the Stage 1 Business Analysis of the PAL process.(2) An accounting of LOIS planning expenditures to date and the remaining balances of appropriated funds at the time of the quarterly submission.(3) Status updates on any requests for federal funding.(4) A copy of the governance and change management plans for LOIS.(5) The involvement in LOIS of individuals and families, regional centers, service providers, and advocacy organizations.(f) The department shall provide the Legislature with a copy of the Post Implementation Evaluation Report for LOIS, when available, which shall include the details of both stakeholder involvement and regular reporting to the Legislature on how the goals specified in subdivision (a) are being met as the project moves into maintenance and operations.(g) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and make specific the provisions of this section by means of written directives or similar instructions consistent with this section.SEC. 20. Section 4519.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4519.2. (a) Through the Developmental Services Task Force, the The department shall identify key indicators to track the regional center system’s delivery of services. These indicators shall include both local and statewide measures and shall include a recommendation for analysis and followup follow up of any concerning trends, as well as a plan for reporting of best practices for use statewide. The department, with stakeholder input, shall also identify recommendations for measuring outcomes and improving outcomes for consumers. Goals for system improvement include enhancement of customer services for consumers and their families, facilitation of enhanced communication between regional centers and the state, and identification and dissemination of best practices for developmental services providers. The department shall report these recommended indicators, best practices, and recommendations for analysis to the Legislature no later than January 10, 2021.(b) (1) Each regional center shall post the following information on its internet website in a format determined by the department no later than April 1, 2020, and shall update the information no less frequently than every six months until the department determines that statewide compliance with the federal Home and Community-Based Services (HCBS) Final Rule has been met, or January 1, 2025, whichever is earlier:(A) The number of providers identified as needing assessment for HCBS compliance, broken down by provider type, as defined by the department.(B) The number of providers within each provider type that have been inspected or reviewed for HCBS compliance.(C) The number of providers within each provider type that have been determined to be HCBS compliant.(D) The number of providers within each provider type that have been determined not to be HCBS compliant and the reason for lack of compliance.(E) The number of providers, broken down by provider type, that have been identified as presumed to have the qualities of an institutional setting, as described in Sections 441.301(c)(5)(v) and 441.710(a)(2)(v) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(2) The department shall provide this information to the Legislature as statewide data and for each regional center, no later than May 1, 2020, and shall post that summary on its internet website.(3) Beginning July 1, 2026, the department shall post the information described in paragraph (1) on its internet website, and shall update the information no less frequently than every six months to monitor compliance with the federal Home and Community-Based Services (HCBS) Final Rule. The information may be collected through the statewide provider directory, the Life Outcomes Improvement System, or any other means identified by the department.(c) (1) The department shall update the Legislature annually, beginning on January 10, 2020, with the number of complaints filed at each regional center pursuant to Section 4731 for the prior fiscal year, and include the following information:(A) The subject matter of complaints filed.(B) How complaints were resolved.(C) The timeframe within which resolutions to those complaints were provided by the regional center.(D) The number of complaints that were appealed to the department, their resolution, and the timeframe within which a written administrative decision was issued.(E) Demographic information, as identified by the department, about consumers on whose behalf the complaint was filed, including the ethnicity of the consumer.(2) The update shall include data for the prior two fiscal years, as available.(3) The department shall also post this data on its internet website.(4) This subdivision shall become inoperative on February 1, 2027.(d) The department and each regional center shall include on their internet websites a link to the protection and advocacy agency designated pursuant to Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4900) and the clients’ rights advocate contracted with pursuant to Section 4433. This link shall be posted on the home page of their internet websites, or in another standard location determined by the department.(e) On and after October 1, 2019, the department shall post all new directives that it issues to regional centers on its internet website.(f) Any reports submitted by the department to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 21. Section 4519.10 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4519.10. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The current service provider rate structure in the system administered by the State Department of Developmental Services lacks transparency, remains complex, is not tied to person-centered outcomes, and varies across providers who provide the same service in the same region.(2) In 2016, the Legislature funded a rate study to address the sustainability, quality, and transparency of community-based services for individuals with developmental disabilities.(3) The department, with the help of a consultant, completed the rate study in 2019 and subsequently submitted the study’s findings and recommendations to the Legislature. Among other things, the study recommended all of the following:(A) Within each service category, rate models that include components that may be regularly updated.(B) Regional differentials to account for regional variance in the cost of living and doing business.(C) Enhanced rates for services delivered in other languages, including American Sign Language.(D) An optional add-on for direct service professional levels and wage differentials based on training and demonstrated competency.(E) The consolidation of certain service codes.(4) The rate study’s fiscal impact analysis indicated that full implementation of these rate models would cost an additional one billion one hundred million dollars ($1,100,000,000) from the General Fund, or one billion eight hundred million dollars ($1,800,000,000) of total funds, in the 2019–20 fiscal year.(5) The recommendations from the rate study and the associated rate models have not been implemented, even as rate study findings informed supplemental rate increases for many service categories in the 2019–20 fiscal year and three additional service categories in the 2020–21 fiscal year.(6) For Medi-Cal eligible consumers, the department receives federal Medicaid reimbursements to support home- and community-based services provided to those consumers.(7) Direct service professionals employed by service providers are critical to the quality and provision of services and supports to individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.(8) A prevailing need and challenge within the developmental services system is moving from a compliance-based system to an outcomes-based system. Outcome measures must reinforce the system’s core values of meeting individual needs based on person-centered planning. The implementation of rates, pursuant to this section, should support this person-centered transformation through consideration of incentive payments, alternative payment models, alternative service delivery, lessons learned from the COVID-19 pandemic period, person-centered and culturally and linguistically sensitive and competent approaches, training of direct service professionals, compliance with the federal home- and community-based services rule set to take effect on March 17, 2023, and methods for assessing and reporting outcomes.(9) To improve consumer outcomes and experiences and measure overall system performance, four goals should guide rate reform:(A) Consumer experience.(B) Equity.(C) Quality and outcomes.(D) System efficiencies.(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to phase in funding and policies beginning in the 2021–22 fiscal year to implement rate reform, which shall include a quality incentive program, create an enhanced person-centered, outcomes-based system, and complete this transformation by July 1, 2025.(c) (1) (A) Commencing April 1, 2022, the department shall implement a rate increase for service providers that equals one-quarter of the difference between current rates and the fully funded rate model for each provider.(B) Commencing January 1, 2023, and continuing through December 31, 2024, the department shall adjust rates to equal one-half of the difference between rates in effect March 31, 2022, and the fully funded rate model for each provider, and additional funding shall be available for the quality incentive program described in subdivision (e).(i) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, it is the intent of the Legislature that the majority of the rate increase described in this subparagraph for the 2022–23 fiscal year be used for the purpose of enhancing wages and benefits for staff who spend a minimum of 75 percent of their time providing direct services to consumers.(ii) Commencing January 1, 2023, a provider shall not spend a smaller percentage of the rate increase on direct care staff wages and benefit costs than the corresponding percentage included for direct care staff wages and benefit costs in the rate models for each specific service.(iii) A provider granted a rate increase pursuant to this section shall maintain documentation, subject to audit by the department or regional center, that the portion of the rate increase identified in this subparagraph was used to increase wages, salaries, or benefits of eligible staff members spending a minimum of 75 percent of their time providing direct services to consumers at least at the same percentage as provided in the rate models.(iv) For the purpose of this subparagraph, “direct services” are services, supports, care, supervision, or assistance provided by staff directly to a consumer to address the consumer’s needs, as identified in the individual program plan, and includes staff’s participation in training and other activities directly related to providing services to consumers, as well as program preparation functions as defined in Section 54302 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.(v) Commencing July 1, 2023, a vendor shall be in compliance with the home- and community-based final rule, effective March 17, 2014, or implementing a corrective action plan, to be eligible for the quality incentive program described in subdivision (e).(C) (i) Commencing January 1, 2025, the department shall implement the fully funded rate models. The fully funded rate models shall be implemented using two payment components, a base rate equaling 90 percent of the rate model, and a quality incentive payment, equaling up to 10 percent of the rate model, to be implemented through the quality incentive program described in subdivision (e).(ii) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing July 1, 2024, the rate models shall be updated to account for the current and any subsequent changes to the statewide minimum wage, as established by Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, or other relevant statute.(2) (A) Effective January 1, 2025, it is the intent of the Legislature that rates be uniform within service categories and adjusted for geographic cost differentials, including differentials in wages, the cost of travel, and the cost of real estate.(B) Providers who were not identified as requiring a rate increase in the rate study are not eligible for rate adjustments pursuant to paragraph (1).(d) (1) Beginning in the 2021–22 fiscal year, the department shall implement a hold harmless policy for providers whose rates exceed rate model recommendations. The policy shall freeze a provider’s existing rates until February 28, 2026, after which time the provider’s rates shall be adjusted to equal the rates for other providers in the provider’s service category and region.(2) Beginning January 1, 2025, the department shall also implement a hold harmless policy for providers whose rates in effect on January 1, 2023, exceed 90 percent of the rate model. The policy shall freeze a provider’s base rate at the rate in effect on January 1, 2023, until February 28, 2026, after which time the provider’s base rates shall be adjusted to equal the base rates for other providers in the provider’s service category and region. The provider shall be eligible for a quality incentive payment that, when added to their base rate, equals the fully funded rate model.(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), the department may adjust rates as a result of reviews or audits.(e) In conjunction with implementing rate reform, the department shall implement a quality incentive program in order to improve consumer outcomes, service provider performance, and the quality of services.(1) (A) The department shall, with input from stakeholders, develop quality measures or benchmarks, or both, for consumer outcomes and regional center and service provider performance. Given the time necessary to identify and develop the measures or benchmarks described in this paragraph, the department may establish quality measures or benchmarks, or both, in the initial years of the quality incentive program that focus on building capacity, developing reporting systems, gathering baseline data, and similar activities while working towards meaningful outcome measures at the individual consumer level for all services. Measures or benchmarks, or both, shall initially include process- and performance-related measures for service providers and, by the conclusion of the 2025–26 fiscal year, shall also evolve to include outcome measures at the individual consumer level. In developing the proposed measures or benchmarks, or both, the department shall do all of the following:(i) Gather public input through regularly held public meetings that are accessible both virtually and by telephone. Public meeting agendas and meeting materials shall be posted at least three days in advance of any meeting and shared by various means, including internet website updates, focus groups, and other communication.(ii) Provide documents, which may include, but are not limited to, updates, concept papers, interim reports, proposals, and performance and quality measures and benchmarks, and revisions to these materials, to the Legislature and post these materials on an internet website for public comment at least 30 days, as required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, prior to submitting a request for federal funding.(iii) Seek input from subject matter experts to understand options for outcomes-based system structures using person-centered planning and alternative payment models.(B) (i) On or before April 1, 2022, proposed quality measures or benchmarks, or both, shall be provided to the Legislature and posted for public comment, as described in subparagraph (A). After the department has considered public comments and modified the proposed quality measures or benchmarks, or both, as needed, the measures or benchmarks, or both, shall be finalized and implemented in the 2022–23 fiscal year.(ii) On or before April 1 of any subsequent year in which the department proposes new or revised quality measures or benchmarks, or both, the proposed measures or benchmarks, or both, shall be provided to the Legislature and posted for public comment, as described in subparagraph (A). After the department has considered public comments and modified the proposed quality measures or benchmarks, or both, as needed, the measures or benchmarks, or both, shall be finalized and implemented in the upcoming fiscal year.(C) Beginning in the 2024–25 fiscal year, there will be opportunity for eligible providers to earn full quality incentive payments through one or more measures.(D) Beginning in the 2026–27 fiscal year, a provider shall be compliant with electronic visit verification, home- and community-based services rules, and applicable annual fiscal reviews and audit requirements as a condition of eligibility for the quality incentive program.(2) (A) The department shall develop a quality incentive payment structure for providers meeting the quality measures or benchmarks, or both, developed pursuant to paragraph (1). The department shall issue written directives to define the way quality incentive payments will be made to service providers based on quality measures or benchmarks, or both, developed and implemented under this subdivision.(B) The department shall determine each provider’s quality incentive payment percentage prior to the start of the fiscal year, with the exception of the 2024–25 fiscal year, by measuring the provider’s performance against the quality measures or benchmarks for the most recently available reporting period. The department shall provide a written communication to the fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature that reports on the total amount of quality incentive payments estimated to be paid to providers pursuant to this section. This written communication shall be made as soon as is practicable, but no later than 60 days after the quality incentive payment percentages are determined and the providers are informed of their payments.(f) On or before March 1, 2024, the department shall provide a status update to the Legislature regarding progress toward implementing rate reform and creating an enhanced person-centered, outcomes-based system. The status update may include, but is not limited to, information about all of the following:(1) Additional changes that may be necessary to effectively implement rate reform, including adding and amending statutes, regulations, and other departmental policies.(2) Compliance with rules of the federal Medicaid program, including the home- and community-based services final rule effective on March 17, 2014, and state compliance consistent with the current federal guidance, including all of the following:(A) A definition of what it means to be compliant with the rules of the federal Medicaid program.(B) Whether there are certain service categories that are unlikely to achieve compliance due to the structure of the service, and, if so, which categories this includes.(C) Data about the total number of providers within each service category and the estimated number of providers that have not yet achieved compliance.(3) Program and system improvement efforts made as a result of the state’s home- and community-based services additional federal funding, including the one-time investment implemented beginning in the 2021–22 state fiscal year, including a description of how the department will build on the investments.(g) For purposes of this section, “rate model” means a rate model included in the rate study submitted to the Legislature pursuant to Section 4519.8.(h) Operative through December 31, 2030, contracts and contract amendments to procure services to implement this section are exempt from the requirements of the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual, and from approval by the Department of General Services. (h)(i) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of written directives or similar instructions until regulations are adopted, which shall occur no later than June 30, 2028. December 31, 2030.(i)(j) Implementation of this section is contingent upon the approval of federal funding.SEC. 22. Section 4519.11 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4519.11. (a) Commencing on July 1, 2025, and every other year thereafter, the department shall review and update the rate models per the cost inputs available at the time of the review and shall post the updated rate models on its internet website no later than January 1 of the following year.(b) An adjustment to a provider rate pursuant to the updated rate models shall be contingent upon the appropriation of funds by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act and approval of federal funding.(c) For purposes of this section, “rate model” means a rate model included in the rate study submitted to the Legislature pursuant to Section 4519.8.(d) Operative through December 31, 2030, contracts and contract amendments to procure services to implement this section are exempt from the requirements of the Public Contract Code and the State Administrative Manual, and from approval by the Department of General Services.SEC. 23. Section 4519.12 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, immediately following Section 4519.11, to read:4519.12. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department and regional centers actively partner with and support regional center service providers to successfully meet the benchmarks of the quality incentive program.(b) The department and regional centers shall continue and enhance robust ongoing technical assistance, training, and operational guidance to service providers.(c) The department shall use the data collected through the quality incentive program to understand and address provider capacity needs in the system and inform and develop the infrastructure necessary to track and achieve quality outcomes.(d) The department shall make data collection requirements clear and accessible, and ensure they do not place an undue administrative burden on service providers.(e) The department shall evaluate the reasons why some providers have been unable to access the quality incentive rate increment for the 2026–27 fiscal year. The department and regional centers shall support service providers in meeting the qualifying prerequisites to maximize access to the quality incentive rate increment for the 2027–28 fiscal year and ongoing, immediately following the department’s issuance of quality incentive measures for each fiscal year.SEC. 24. Section 4572 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4572. The State Department of Developmental Services shall develop and implement a plan to monitor, evaluate, and improve the quality of community-based services through the use of a performance dashboard. The department shall work with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, regional centers, consumer advocates, providers, and the Legislature, on the development of the dashboard. The dashboard shall be published annually and in a machine-readable format. Each regional center shall publish its own dashboard and shall post a link to the department’s dashboard on its internet website. The dashboard shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following metrics:(a) Recognized quality and access measures.(b) Measures to indicate the movement toward compliance with the federal Home and Community-Based Services Waiver rules (CMS 2249-F and CMS 2296-F).(c) Measures to evaluate the changes in the number of consumers who work in competitive integrated employment.(d) The (1) Until February 1, 2027, the number of complaints referred to the department pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4731, for every 1,000 consumers served, by each regional center.(2) Commencing February 1, 2027, the information described in subdivision (o) of Section 4891.(e) The number of administrative fair hearings held pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 4710) of Chapter 7, separated by eligibility and service issues, for individuals ages three and over, for every one thousand consumers served, by each regional center.SEC. 25. Section 4620.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4620.3. (a) To provide more uniformity and consistency in the administrative practices and services of regional centers throughout the state, promote appropriateness of services, maximize efficiency of funding, address the state budget deficit, ensure consistency with Lanterman Act values, maintain the entitlement to services, and improve cost-effectiveness, the department, in collaboration with stakeholders, shall develop best practices for the administrative management of regional centers and for regional centers to use when purchasing services for consumers and families.(b) In developing regional center administrative management best practices, the department shall consider the establishment of policies and procedures to ensure prudent fiscal and program management by regional centers; effective and efficient use of public resources; consistent practices to maximize the use of federal funds; detection and prevention of fraud, waste, and abuse; and proper contracting protocols.(c) In developing purchase of services best practices, the department shall consider eligibility for the service; duration of service necessary to meet objectives set in an individual program plan; frequency and efficacy of the service necessary to meet objectives in an individual program plan; impact on community integration; service providers’ qualifications and performance; rates; parental and consumer responsibilities pursuant to Sections 4646.4, 4659, and 4677 of this code and Section 95004 of the Government Code; and self-directed service options.(d) The department shall ensure that implementation of best practices that impact individual services and supports are made through the individual program planning process provided for in this division or an individualized family service plan pursuant to Section 95020 of the Government Code, and that consumers and families are notified of any exceptions or exemptions to the best practices and their appeal rights established in Section 4701.(e) Purchase of services best practices developed pursuant to this section may vary by service category and may do all of the following:(1) Establish criteria determining the type, scope, amount, duration, location, and intensity of services and supports purchased by regional centers for consumers and their families.(2) Modify payment rates.(3) Reflect family and consumer responsibilities, pursuant to Sections 4646.4, 4659, and 4677 of this code and Section 95004 of the Government Code.(f) Purchase of services best practices shall include provisions for exceptions to ensure the health and safety of the consumer or to avoid out-of-home placement or institutionalization.(g) Best practices developed pursuant to this section shall not do either of the following:(1) Endanger a consumer’s health or safety.(2) Compromise the state’s ability to meet its commitments to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for participation in the Home and Community-Based Services Waiver or other federal funding of services for persons with developmental disabilities.(h) The department shall submit the proposed best practices to the fiscal and applicable policy committees of the Legislature by no later than May 15, 2011. This submission shall include a description of the process followed to collaborate with system stakeholders; the anticipated impact of the best practices, coupled with prior reductions on consumers, families, and providers; estimated cost savings associated with each practice; and draft statutory language necessary to implement the best practices. Implementation of the best practices shall take effect only upon subsequent legislative enactment.(i) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.SEC. 26. Section 4620.3 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:4620.3. (a) To provide more uniformity and consistency in the administrative practices and services of regional centers throughout the state, promote appropriateness of services, maximize efficiency of funding, address the state budget deficit, ensure consistency with Lanterman Act values, maintain the entitlement to services, and improve cost-effectiveness, the department, in collaboration with stakeholders, shall develop best practices for the administrative management of regional centers and for regional centers to use when purchasing services for consumers and families.(b) In developing regional center administrative management best practices, the department shall consider the establishment of policies and procedures to ensure prudent fiscal and program management by regional centers; effective and efficient use of public resources; consistent practices to maximize the use of federal funds; detection and prevention of fraud, waste, and abuse; and proper contracting protocols.(c) In developing purchase of services best practices, the department shall consider eligibility for the service; duration of service necessary to meet objectives set in an individual program plan; frequency and efficacy of the service necessary to meet objectives in an individual program plan; impact on community integration; service providers’ qualifications and performance; rates; parental and consumer responsibilities pursuant to Sections 4646.4, 4659, and 4677 of this code and Section 95004 of the Government Code; and self-directed service options.(d) The department shall ensure that implementation of best practices that impact individual services and supports are made through the individual program planning process provided for in this division or an individualized family service plan pursuant to Section 95020 of the Government Code, and that consumers and families are notified of any exceptions or exemptions to the best practices and their appeal rights established in Section 4701.(e) Purchase of services best practices developed pursuant to this section may vary by service category and may do all of the following:(1) Establish criteria determining the type, scope, amount, duration, location, and intensity of services and supports purchased by regional centers for consumers and their families.(2) Modify payment rates.(3) Reflect family and consumer responsibilities, pursuant to Sections 4646.4, 4659, and 4677 of this code and Section 95004 of the Government Code.(f) Purchase of services best practices shall include provisions for exceptions to ensure the health and safety of the consumer or to avoid out-of-home placement or institutionalization.(g) Best practices developed pursuant to this section shall not do either of the following:(1) Endanger a consumer’s health or safety.(2) Compromise the state’s ability to meet its commitments to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for participation in the Home and Community-Based Services Waiver or other federal funding of services for persons with developmental disabilities.(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.SEC. 27. Section 4620.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4620.5. (a) Beginning as early as possible after July 1, 2021, but no later than September 1, 2021, the department shall convene a workgroup, which shall be composed of individuals described under subdivision (b), to make recommendations to the department for the development of standard performance improvement indicators and benchmarks to incentivize high-quality regional center operations.(b) The director shall appoint members to the stakeholder group and shall consider all of the following individuals to serve as members of that group:(1) Individuals or consultants with expertise in developing performance indicators and incentive programs within developmental disability systems or community-based long-term services and supports systems.(2) Consumers and families across different geographic regions of the state, who have diverse racial and ethnic backgrounds, diverse consumer age groups, and disabilities.(3) Regional center representatives.(4) Service providers.(5) Representatives of other state agencies or entities with whom the department routinely collaborates for the coordination of services for people with developmental disabilities, and who additionally have expertise in setting or reporting indicators and benchmarks, including reporting to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.(6) Representatives of California’s University Centers for Excellence in Developmental Disabilities, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, the protection and advocacy agency specified in Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4900), and consumer and family advocacy groups.(c) By January 10, 2022, as part of the Governor’s Budget, the department shall provide a status update based on recommendations provided by the stakeholder workgroup, with an additional status update at the time of the Governor’s May Revision. These recommendations may include all of the following:(1) Priority areas for performance indicators and benchmarks, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) Equity in service access and purchase of services.(B) Consumer employment and associated metrics.(C) Integration of consumers in the community.(D) Person-centered planning.(E) Compliance with federal home and community-based standards.(F) Consumer and family experience and satisfaction.(G) Innovation in service availability and delivery.(2) Surveys or other measures to assess consumer and family experience, satisfaction, and recommendations, in addition the use of data available through the National Core Indicators.(3) Benchmarks, and a method for establishing benchmarks, to create meaningful comparisons and understanding of variation in performance within and between regional centers.(4) Measures under development or already implemented by federal funding agencies for long-term services and supports, home and community-based services, incentive payments, required reporting, and the efficient and effective implementation of performance improvement systems.(5) Additional criteria for demonstrating performance improvement, including improvement beyond benchmarks.(6) The methodology, structure, and types of incentives to be used, including, if appropriate, a payment schedule and implementation timeline, for incentive payments to regional centers to achieve or exceed performance benchmarks. This methodology and structure shall include how the department shall take into consideration variations among regional centers, expectations for regional center community engagement activities, and any significant demographic, including economic or other differences, impacting a regional center’s performance and how the department might build the identified benchmarks into regional center performance contracts.(7) A process, based on the input from regional centers and other stakeholders, the department shall use on at least an annual basis to evaluate the success of a quality improvement process, including any incentive payment program.(d) Department-approved performance measures developed pursuant to this section shall be incorporated into regional center contracts, as set forth in Section 4629, to standardize outcome measures and benchmarks that incentivize high-quality regional center operations. The department shall give consideration to the availability of regional center operations funding when establishing and revising these measures.SEC. 28. Section 4621.6 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:4621.6. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to allow for uninterrupted supports for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities and provide for the timely allocation of resources to regional centers.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall issue and adjust funding allocations to the regional centers, as specified in Section 4620. Funding allocations and adjustments may be done, at the department’s discretion, by letter, contract, or contract amendment, and shall be consistent with, and subject to, funding appropriated in the annual Budget Act. Funding allocations and adjustments made pursuant to this section are exempt from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and are not subject to the approval of the Department of General Services pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10295 of the Public Contract Code.(c) The exemptions provided in subdivision (b) do not apply to funding allocations and adjustments for contracts for noninformation technology goods or information technology goods and services.SEC. 29. Section 4622 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4622. The state shall contract only with agencies, agencies to serve as regional centers as described in Section 4620, the governing boards of which conform to all of the following criteria: criteria by no later than January 1, 2028:(a) (1) The governing board shall be composed of no more than 17 individuals with demonstrated interest in, or knowledge of, developmental disabilities.(b)The membership of the governing board shall include persons with legal, management or board governance, financial, and developmental disability program expertise. Board governance expertise may not be acquired solely by serving on a regional center board. The governing board of the regional center shall include members with financial expertise and members with management or board governance expertise by August 15, 2020. (2) Any existing member of the governing board as of December 31, 2027, in excess of the 17-member limit in paragraph (1) shall be permitted to complete no more than 12 months of their remaining term beyond that date if the existing member is compliant with subdivision (f).(c)The(b) Effective January 1, 2028, membership of the governing board shall include representatives of the various categories of disability to be served by the regional center. board, as a whole, shall possess at least two years of experience in all of the following topics:(1) California law.(2) Management of a medium or large organization.(3) Board governance, as evidenced by experience serving on the board of an entity that is not a regional center.(4) Fiscal or financial subjects.(5) Developmental disability programs, including program administration, service provision, or policy advocacy.(d)(c) The governing board shall reflect the geographic geographic, disability, and ethnic characteristics of the area to be served by the regional center.(e)(d) A minimum of 50 percent of the members of the governing board shall be persons with developmental disabilities or their parents family members or legal guardians. No less than 25 percent of the members of the governing board shall be persons with developmental disabilities. disabilities who are receiving regional center services.(f)(e) Members of the governing board shall not be permitted to serve more than seven years within each eight-year period.(g)(1)The regional center shall provide necessary training and support to these board members to facilitate their understanding and participation, including issues relating to linguistic and cultural competency.(f) (1) Effective January 1, 2028, all members of the governing board, prior to assuming or continuing their role and annually thereafter to maintain their role, shall complete trainings provided by or approved by the department. The training shall be implemented following consultation with the community, including the State Council on Developmental Disabilities. Training topics shall include, but are not limited to, the following:(A) Board management and operations, including the following:(i) Mission.(ii) Bylaws.(iii) Organization structure.(iv) Roles and responsibilities.(v) Policies, including whistle-blower policies and protections.(vi) Fiduciary responsibilities.(vii) Conflicts of interest.(viii) Robert’s Rules of Order or other comparable boardsmanship rules.(B) Ethics.(C) Regional center contract requirements.(D) Obligations of the governing board as outlined in this section, including training, annual evaluation of the executive director, and review of the performance of the regional center.(E) Legal requirements for open meetings.(F) Catchment description and demographic information.(G) Service access and equity issues, including, but not limited to, purchase of service information and equity measures established by the department.(H) Overviews of the programs and services under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)) and early start program under Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code.(2) The annual continuing training required by paragraph (1) may be shorter than the initial training for new board members, as determined by the department following consultation with regional centers.(3) The department shall issue a directive to regional centers regarding training requirements and the approved training curriculum necessary to comply with this section no later than February 1, 2027.(4) Effective January 1, 2028, governing board members who do not meet the training requirements specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not participate in meetings and decisions of the governing board until they complete the required training. (2)(5) As part of its monitoring responsibility, the department shall review and approve the method by which the training and support are provided to board members to ensure pursuant to this subdivision to verify that it enables maximum understanding and participation by board members.(3)Each regional center shall post on its internet website information regarding the training and support provided to board members.(6) Each regional center shall post on its internet website information regarding the training provided to board members(g) (1) Whenever possible, materials and information provided to board members shall be in plain language so that a member can understand their responsibilities and exercise appropriate oversight as board members of the regional center.(2) The regional center shall provide individualized supports and reasonable accommodations to every member of the governing board so each person can fully and effectively participate in board discussions and decisions. The regional center shall designate an employee responsible for coordinating requested supports and accommodations and providing accessible materials and meetings. Supports and accommodations may include, but are not limited to, pre-meeting preparation, communication supports, assistive technology, accessible formats, interpretations, facilitation, captioning, and other assistance or modifications as needed.(3) If a board member does not feel adequately supported to effectively participate in board meetings, the board member may contact the department’s regional center liaison assigned to that regional center with those concerns.(h) (1) The governing board may shall appoint a consumers’ advisory committee an advisory group composed of persons with lived experiences with intellectual and developmental disabilities representing the various categories of disability served by the regional center. The advisory group shall subsequently designate two of its members to serve on the governing board. The group shall also designate a family member or legal guardian of a person with a developmental or intellectual disability, of its members, to serve on the governing board. These designees shall have renewable terms not to exceed two years, and are subject to subdivisions (e) and (f).(2) The governing board shall include at least one of the designees identified in paragraph (1) as a voting member of the governing board’s committee that recruits, screens, and recommends approval of applicants seeking to join the regional center’s governing board.(i) The governing board shall appoint an advisory committee composed of a wide variety of persons representing the various categories of providers from which the regional center purchases client services. The advisory committee shall provide advice, guidance, recommendations, and technical assistance to the regional center board in order to assist the regional center in carrying out its mandated functions. The advisory committee shall designate one of its members to serve as a member of the regional center board.(j) (1) The governing board shall annually review the performance of the executive director of the regional center. The evaluations shall be based upon the executive director’s leadership on, but not be limited to, the following:(A) The regional center’s compliance with the objectives of its contract with the department.(B) Compliance with required audits, and progress in addressing any findings identified in prior and most recent audits.(C) Improving the regional center’s status on regional center performance measures.(2) These evaluations shall provide clear future expectations to the executive director.(2)(3) The governing board shall also annually review the performance of the regional center in providing services that are linguistically and culturally appropriate and may provide recommendations to the executive director of the regional center based on the results of that review. The governing board’s review may include, but is not limited to, the following:(A) The effectiveness of the regional center’s efforts to address equity in access to and expenditures on services, inclusive of equity measures published by the department, and on efforts to improve language access to information.(B) The regional center’s data regarding the number of timely translations of individual program plans, as described in paragraphs (6) and (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 4519.5.(C) Assessment of the regional center’s website accessibility rating, relative to the federal requirements in Section 441.313 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(D) The regional center’s responsiveness to a range of community needs and concerns, including, but not limited to, intake and assessment timelines, person-centeredness, timeliness and accuracy of payments to service providers, equity including statewide equity measures, the unique needs of populations involved with the justice or child welfare systems or who have cooccurring conditions, and coordination with local entities that provide generic services.(E) Other issues, as identified by the community during public meetings.(k) No member of the board who is an employee or member of the governing board of a provider from which the regional center purchases client services shall do any of the following:(1) Serve as an officer of the board.(2) Vote on any fiscal matter affecting the purchase of services from any regional center provider.(3) Vote on any issue other than as described in paragraph (2), in which the member has a financial interest, as defined in Section 87103 of the Government Code, and as further determined by the regional center board. The member shall provide a list of the member’s financial interests, as defined in Section 87103, to the regional center board. Nothing(l) Nothing in this section shall prevent the appointment to a regional center governing board of a person who meets the criteria for more than one of the categories listed above.(m) (1) Each governing board shall adopt an anti-retaliation policy to protect board members and regional center employees from retaliation. For purposes of this article, “retaliation” means any adverse action, threat, intimidation, coercion, or harassment because a person is acting within the scope of their responsibilities.(2) The department shall provide all governing boards a model policy for this purpose. Any amendments to the model policy sought by an individual governing board shall not become effective before first being approved by the department.(3) The department shall designate an employee to answer questions about this policy and receive allegations of retaliation pursuant to this policy. The department shall investigate those allegations and shall require appropriate corrective action to be taken for substantiated allegations.(n) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific through written directives the changes made to this section by legislation enacted in the 2025-26 legislative session. These directives shall be operative until final regulations are effective, which shall be no later than September 30, 2029.SEC. 30. Section 4625.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4625.5. (a) The governing board of each regional center shall adopt and maintain a written policy requiring the board to review and approve any regional center contract of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or more, before entering into the contract.(b) No regional A regional center contract of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or more shall not be valid unless approved by the governing board of the regional center in compliance with its written policy pursuant to subdivision (a).(c)For purposes of this section, contracts do not include vendor approval letters issued by regional centers pursuant to Section 54322 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), for purposes of this section:(1) (A) Until July 1, 2030, contracts requiring approval by the governing board of a regional center shall have an identified monetary value of three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) or more.(B) As of July 1, 2030, the monetary value for the contract specified in subparagraph (A) shall be four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000), and every five years thereafter, it shall be increased by fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).(2) Contracts do not include either of the following:(A) Vendor approval letters issued by regional centers pursuant to Section 54322 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.(B) Purchase of service authorizations.SEC. 31. Section 4625.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is repealed.4625.6.To ensure the delivery of independent legal advice, an attorney retained or employed by the governing board of the regional center to provide legal services shall not be an employee of the regional center.SEC. 32. Section 4625.6 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:4625.6. (a) To ensure compliance with applicable laws and regulations, and to assist with governance and organizational structure, the governing board of the regional center shall retain or employ an attorney by no later than July 1, 2027, to provide general legal advice and counsel. The attorney shall have at least five years of legal experience in representing a private or nonprofit public benefit corporation, government agency, or other public entity.(b) To ensure the delivery of independent legal advice, an attorney retained or employed by the governing board of the regional center shall not be an employee of the regional center.(c) The board’s attorney shall be present at all regional center board meetings and executive committee meetings where final decisions are made.(d) The board’s attorney shall advise the governing board on matters, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) The role of the board.(2) Board operations and governance.(3) Conduct of meetings, including parliamentary rules.(4) Open meeting requirements.(5) Rules for closed sessions.(6) Executive director contract writing and compliance.(7) Assistance for members of the board.(8) Conflict of interest monitoring, reporting, and resolution.(e) To permit adequate time for recruitment of an appropriately qualified attorney, as described in subdivision (a), in the event of a vacancy in this position of not more than six months, the governing board and its executive committee shall be permitted to take final action in the absence of a retained attorney. The public meeting notice shall include a statement that the board may take action at the meeting in the absence of the attorney required by this section.SEC. 33. Section 4629 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4629. (a) The state shall enter into five-year contracts with regional centers, subject to the annual appropriation of funds by the Legislature.(b) The contracts shall include a provision requiring each regional center to render services in accordance with applicable provision of provisions of federal and state laws and regulations. regulations and written directives from the department.(c) (1) The contracts shall include statewide annual performance objectives improvement indicators and benchmarks, hereinafter collectively referred to as “performance measures,” developed pursuant to Section 4620.5 and outcome measures that the department determines are necessary to ensure each regional center is complying with the requirement specified in subdivision (b), including, but not limited to, objectives that do both of the following: (b). These performance measures shall:(A) Be specific, measurable, and designed to do all of the following:(i) Assist consumers individuals to achieve life quality outcomes.(ii) Achieve meaningful progress above the current baselines.(iii) Develop Improve timely access to services and supports identified as necessary to meet identified needs, including facilitating access to generic services and to culturally and linguistically appropriate services and supports. supports provided by regional centers.(iv) Measure progress in reducing disparities and improving equity in purchase of service expenditures. equity, including in outcomes for individuals receiving regional center services and consistent with equity measures published by the department.(v) Measure progress, and report outcomes, in implementing the Employment First Policy, employment services and supports, which may include, but are not limited to, measures addressing both of the following:(I) Establishment of local partnership agreements between regional centers, local educational agencies, and the Department of Rehabilitation districts.(II) The provision of information to consumers regarding the Employment First Policy, individuals regarding employment services, opportunities for employment, and available supports to achieve integrated competitive employment.(III) The development of regional center and service provider capacity to improve individuals’ attainment and retention of competitive integrated employment opportunities, through best practices, community outreach and partnerships, informed choice, or improved coordination of entities and policies, including through alignment with the objectives and terms of the interagency agreement described in Section 4868.6.(vi) Measure progress and report on performance measures to implement programs that incentivize high-quality regional center operations pursuant to Section 4620.5.(B) Be developed through a public process as described in the department’s guidelines led by the department that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(i) Providing information, in an understandable form, to the community about regional center services and supports, including budget information and baseline data on services and supports and regional center operations.(ii) Conducting a public meeting where participants can provide input on performance objectives measures and using focus groups or surveys to collect information from the community.(iii) Circulating a draft of the performance objectives measures to the community for input prior to presentation at a regional center board a second public meeting where additional public input will be taken and considered before the regional center’s adoption of the objectives. measures.(2) In addition to the performance objectives developed measures utilized pursuant to this section, the department may specify in the performance contract additional areas of service and support that require development or enhancement by the a regional center. In determining those areas, the department shall consider public comments from individuals and organizations within the regional center catchment area, organizations, the distribution of services and supports within the regional center a regional center’s catchment area, and review how the availability of services and supports in the regional area center catchment area compares with other regional center catchment areas.(3) Regional center governing boards may adopt additional performance measures beyond the statewide performance measures at their discretion.(d) Each contract with a regional center shall specify steps to be taken to ensure contract compliance, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) Incentives that encourage regional centers to meet or exceed performance standards. measures.(2) Levels of probationary status for regional centers that do not meet, or are at risk of not meeting, performance standards. measures. The department shall require that corrective action be taken by any regional center that is placed on probation. Corrective action may include, but is not limited to, mandated consultation with designated representatives of the Association of Regional Center Agencies or a management team designated by the department, contractor, or both. The department shall establish the specific timeline for the implementation of corrective action and monitor its implementation. When a regional center is placed on probation, the department shall provide the state council and the clients’ rights advocacy contractor advocate identified in Section 4433 with a copy of the correction plan, timeline, and any other action taken by the department relating to the probationary status of the regional center. center, for their review and feedback.(e) In order to evaluate the regional center’s compliance with its contract performance objectives measures and legal obligations related to those objectives, measures, the department shall do both of the following:(1) Annually assess each regional center’s achievement of its previous year’s objectives performance measures and make the assessment, including baseline data and performance objectives measures of the individual regional centers, available to the public. The department may make a special commendation of the regional centers that have best engaged the community in the development of contract performance objectives measures and have made the most meaningful progress in meeting or exceeding contract performance objectives. measures.(2) Regularly monitor the activities of the regional center to ensure compliance with the provisions of its contracts, including, but not limited to, reviewing all of the following: status relative to the established performance measures, including all of the following:(A) The regional center’s public process for compliance with the procedures set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).(B) Each regional center’s performance objectives for compliance with the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c).(C) Any public comments on regional center performance objectives sent to the department or to the regional centers, and soliciting public input on the public process and final performance standards.(f) (1) Beginning May 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, each regional center’s governing board shall hold one or more public meetings regarding its prior year’s contract performance objectives compliance and performance measures and outcomes. The meetings may be held separately from meetings held pursuant to Section 4660. The regional center shall provide individuals attending these meetings with data and any associated information to facilitate discussion and community input. Regional centers shall inform the department that a meeting has been scheduled at least 30 days prior to the meeting. Notice of the meetings shall also be posted on the regional center’s internet website at least 30 days prior to the meeting and shall be sent to regional center consumers and families and individual stakeholders at least 30 days prior to the meeting. Each regional center, in holding the meetings required by this subdivision, shall ensure that the meetings and meeting materials provide language access, as required by state and federal law, and shall schedule the meetings at times and locations designed to promote attendance by the public. To encourage participation by diverse language, racial, and ethnic communities, the regional center shall consider strategies to promote opportunities for public comment.(2) Each regional center governing board shall report to the department regarding the outcomes of each public meeting held pursuant to paragraph (1) within 90 days of the meeting. The report shall include, but shall not be limited to, both of the following:(A) Copies of minutes from each meeting and comments obtained from other strategies utilized to provide opportunities for public comment from diverse language, racial, and ethnic communities.(B) The regional center’s recommendations and a plan to address areas where improvement is needed.(g) The renewal of each contract shall be contingent upon compliance with the contract, including, but not limited to, the performance objectives measures, and achievement of sufficient progress towards meeting the requirements of any corrective action plan imposed by the state, as determined through the department’s evaluation.SEC. 34. Section 4636 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4636. (a) If necessary, to avoid disruption of the service program, the department may directly directly, or through contract, operate a regional center during the interim period between the termination of its contract with one governing board and the assumption of operating responsibility by a regional center contract with another governing board. In no event shall the department directly operate a regional center program for longer than 120 days before contracting with a new governing board. The department may, if requested by the new governing board, continue to provide arrange for additional assistance to avoid disruption of the service program, until such time as the new governing board has assumed full responsibility for the operation of the program.(b) The department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing every six months of progress in transitioning to a new governing board, until the transition is complete.SEC. 35. Section 4648 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4648. In order to achieve the stated objectives of a consumer’s individual program plan, the regional center shall conduct activities, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(a) Securing needed services and supports.(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that services and supports assist individuals with developmental disabilities to achieve the greatest self-sufficiency possible and to exercise personal choices. The regional center shall secure services and supports that meet the needs of the consumer, as determined in the consumer’s individual program plan, and within the context of the individual program plan, the planning team shall give highest preference to those services and supports that would allow minors with developmental disabilities to live with their families, adult persons with developmental disabilities to live as independently as possible in the community, and that allow all consumers to interact with persons without disabilities in positive, meaningful ways.(2) In implementing individual program plans, regional centers, through the planning team, shall first consider services and supports in natural community, home, work, and recreational settings. Services and supports shall be flexible and individually tailored to the consumer and, if appropriate, the consumer’s family.(3) (A) A regional center may, pursuant to vendorization or a contract, purchase services or supports for a consumer from an individual or agency that the regional center and consumer or, if appropriate, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, or conservator, or authorized representatives, determines will best accomplish all or part of that consumer’s program plan.(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that remote services are an option for individuals when appropriate, necessary, and the individual’s choice. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the authorization of remote services does not result in the reduction of access to in-person services or become a default choice. It is further the intent of the Legislature that there is a fidelity of practice for services and supports provided remotely, and that until February 1, 2028, and after this date as the remote services and supports continue, the State Department of Developmental Services shall track and report on outcomes of these remote services and supports for individuals served and assess if the services and supports are working as intended and for the support and assistance to individuals served pursuant to this act and all of its core principles.(i) Until December 31, 2028, if remotely receiving services or supports listed in this section, or if Medi-Cal covered services received through clinically appropriate telehealth modalities would meaningfully meet the needs identified through the planning team process, individuals and families may choose to receive any of the following services remotely if offered by the authorized service provider:(I) Day programs, as defined in paragraphs (2), (7), (12), and (16) of subdivision (a) of Section 54302 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.(II) Look-alike day programs.(III) Independent living programs, as defined in paragraph (35) of subdivision (a) of Section 54302 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.(IV) Behavioral therapy services, defined in paragraphs (11) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 54342 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations. Providers providing these services shall adhere to state and federal Medicaid requirements, as established by the State Department of Health Care Services. Behavioral health treatment services or supports provided in accordance with Section 14132.03 that are funded, in whole or in part, with state appropriated funds shall comply with all applicable state and federal statutes, regulations, and Medi-Cal program policies.(V) Remote administration of clinical assessment activities shall not be done when in-person administration is necessary for the validity, reliability, accuracy, or completeness of the assessment or eligibility determination for the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act pursuant to Section 4643.(VI) An individual’s choice to receive remote delivery of services shall be documented in the individual program plan.(ii) Beginning in March 2027, the department shall include the following information in quarterly updates to the Legislature, statewide and broken down by regional center:(I) The number of individuals receiving remote services, including as a percentage of all individuals receiving services and shown both in the aggregate and broken out by service type as listed in clause (i).(II) The ages of individuals receiving remote services.(III) Any differences in usage of remote services in rural areas relative to urban areas.(iii) The department shall report to the Legislature no later than February 1, 2028, survey results regarding all of the following:(I) A summary of the reasons remote services were authorized, including the types of needs, preferences, or circumstances that led to their use.(II) Satisfaction of the individuals receiving remote services.(III) Data derived from service provider reporting, regional center monitoring, and direct feedback from individuals and families, including the duration of use of remote services and supports, to the extent available.(IV) If participation in remote services contributes to social isolation, diminishes opportunities for community integration, or reduces access to meaningful social relationships and activities.(V) An evaluation of the outcomes for individuals served, including whether or not the remote services and supports are working as intended, considering the fidelity of practice or the extent to which services and supports by service type, as listed under clause (i), are implemented as intended or if there is a diminishment of the service due to the remote nature of service and support delivery.(iv) Providers shall document the remote services each individual receives on a monthly basis, pursuant to written instructions issued by the department, which shall include the collection of information necessary to comply with this section.(v) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific the provisions of this subparagraph by means of written directives or similar instructions. (A)(C) Vendorization or contracting is the process for identification, selection, and utilization of service vendors or contractors, based on the qualifications and other requirements necessary in order to provide the service.(B)(D) A regional center may reimburse an individual or agency for services or supports provided to a regional center consumer if the individual or agency has a rate of payment for vendored or contracted services established by the department, pursuant to this division, and is providing services pursuant to an emergency vendorization or has completed the vendorization procedures or has entered into a contract with the regional center and continues to comply with the vendorization or contracting requirements. The director department shall adopt regulations governing the vendorization process to be utilized by the department, regional centers, vendors, and the individual or agency requesting vendorization.(C)(E) Regulations shall include, but not be limited to: the vendor application process, and the basis for accepting or denying an application; the qualification and requirements for each category of services that may be provided to a regional center consumer through a vendor; requirements for emergency vendorization; procedures for termination of vendorization; and the procedure for an individual or an agency to appeal a vendorization decision made by the department or regional center.(D)(F) A regional center may vendorize a licensed facility for exclusive services to persons with developmental disabilities at a capacity equal to or less than the facility’s licensed capacity. A facility already licensed on January 1, 1999, shall continue to be vendorized at their full licensed capacity until the facility agrees to vendorization at a reduced capacity.(E)(G) Effective July 1, 2009, notwithstanding any other law or regulation, a regional center shall not newly vendor a State Department of Social Services licensed 24-hour residential care facility with a licensed capacity of 16 or more beds, unless the facility qualifies for receipt of federal funds under the Medicaid program.(H) (i) Effective January 1, 2027, a vendor shall not be required to maintain a physical location within a regional center’s service area unless a physical location is required for the delivery of services, such as, but not limited to, in a licensed residential facility. A vendor shall maintain a business address validated by the United States Postal Service within the geographic area of the regional center that initially approved that vendor.(ii) The department may repeal or amend any regulations necessary to implement clause (i), through the Office of Administrative Law.(4) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) (D) of paragraph (3), a regional center may contract or issue a voucher for services and supports provided to a consumer or family at a cost not to exceed the maximum rate of payment for that service or support established by the department. If a rate has not been established by the department, the regional center may, for an interim period, contract for a specified service or support with, and establish a rate of payment for, a provider of the service or support necessary to implement a consumer’s individual program plan. Contracts may be negotiated for a period of up to three years, with annual review and subject to the availability of funds.(5) In order to ensure the maximum flexibility and availability of appropriate services and supports for persons with developmental disabilities, the department shall establish and maintain an equitable system of payment to providers of services and supports identified as necessary to the implementation of a consumer’s individual program plan. The system of payment shall include a provision for a rate to ensure that the provider can meet the special needs of consumers and provide quality services and supports in the least restrictive setting as required by law.(6) The regional center and the consumer, or if appropriate, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, including those appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4541, subdivision (b) of Section 4701.6, or subdivision (e) of Section 4705, shall, pursuant to the individual program plan, consider all of the following when selecting a provider of consumer services and supports:(A) A provider’s ability to deliver quality services or supports that can accomplish all or part of the consumer’s individual program plan.(B) A provider’s success in achieving the objectives set forth in the individual program plan.(C) If appropriate, the existence of licensing, accreditation, or professional certification.(D) (i) The cost of providing services or supports of comparable quality by different providers, if available, shall be reviewed, and the least costly available provider of comparable service, including the cost of transportation, who is able to accomplish all or part of the consumer’s individual program plan, consistent with the particular needs of the consumer and family as identified in the individual program plan, shall be selected. In determining the least costly provider, the availability of federal financial participation shall be considered. The consumer shall not be required to use the least costly provider if it will result in the consumer moving from an existing provider of services or supports to more restrictive or less integrated services or supports.(ii) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department shall, with input from the community, issue a written directive defining the term “cost effective” for the purposes of all programs, including, but not limited to, the Self-Determination Program, no later than August 1, 2026. This directive shall remain in effect until regulations are adopted, but in no case for longer than two years following its issuance. Upon notification by the department to the Legislature that the written directive has been issued, clause (i) shall be ineffective.(iii) For purposes of clause (ii), input from the community shall include, but not be limited to, consultation with the department’s Lived Experience Advisory Group, individuals and families, caregivers, advocates and associations, service providers, regional centers, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities Statewide Self‑Determination Advisory Committee, and legislative staff. The department shall provide adequate notice, or 45 days at a minimum, for the community to review and provide feedback on the draft written directive, with review and consideration by the department of feedback prior to finalization for the August 1, 2026, deadline.(E) The consumer’s choice of providers, or, if appropriate, the consumer’s parent’s, legal guardian’s, authorized representative’s, or conservator’s choice of providers.(7) A service or support provided by an agency or individual shall not be continued unless the consumer or, if appropriate, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, or conservator, or authorized representative, including those appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4541, subdivision (b) of Section 4701.6, or subdivision (e) of Section 4705, is satisfied and the regional center and the consumer or, if appropriate, the consumer’s parents or legal guardian or conservator agree that planned services and supports have been provided, and reasonable progress toward objectives have been made.(8) Regional center funds shall not be used to supplant the budget of an agency that has a legal responsibility to serve all members of the general public and is receiving public funds for providing those services.(9) (A) To maximize federal financial participation and facilitate timely access to residential placements of consumers in foster care, the department shall enter into interagency agreements to obtain state and federal funding with the state departments that oversee the agencies that have the legal responsibility to serve all members of the general public and receive public funds for providing those services. The interagency agreement shall specify the proportion or amount of funds reimbursed by each state department or other responsible agency. Following completion of the interagency agreement, the departments shall jointly notify the local agencies.(B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and if specified in the joint notification received pursuant to subparagraph (A), regional centers shall fund the vendored residential service types specified in the joint notification provided to a regional center consumer who is a child or nonminor dependent who has been adjudged a dependent of the court pursuant to Section 300 or has not been adjudged a dependent of the court pursuant to Section 300 but is in the custody of the county welfare department, or has been adjudged a ward of the court pursuant to Section 601 or 602 and placed in the care and custody of the county probation department. The residential services and supports purchased by the regional center shall be consistent with the consumer’s individual program plan regardless of the placing agency or placing authority. This section shall not apply to placements made in an institution for mental diseases, as defined in Section 435.1010 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(C) This paragraph shall be implemented in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California and the Association of Regional Center Agencies.(10) (A) A regional center may, directly or through an agency acting on behalf of the center, provide placement in, purchase of, or follow-along services to persons with developmental disabilities in, appropriate community living arrangements, including, but not limited to, support service for consumers in homes they own or lease, foster family placements, health care facilities, and licensed community care facilities. In considering appropriate placement alternatives for children with developmental disabilities, approval by the child’s parent or guardian shall be obtained before placement is made.(B) Effective July 1, 2012, notwithstanding any other law or regulation, a regional center shall not purchase residential services from a State Department of Social Services licensed 24-hour residential care facility with a licensed capacity of 16 or more beds. This prohibition on regional center purchase of residential services does not apply to either of the following:(i) A residential facility with a licensed capacity of 16 or more beds that has been approved to participate in the department’s Home and Community Based Services Waiver or another existing waiver program or certified to participate in the Medi-Cal program.(ii) A residential facility licensed as a mental health rehabilitation center by the State Department of Health Care Services under any of the following circumstances:(I) The facility is eligible for Medicaid reimbursement and the individual’s planning team determines that there are no less restrictive placements appropriate for the individual.(II) There is an emergency circumstance in which the regional center determines that it cannot locate alternate federally eligible services to meet the consumer’s needs. Under an emergency circumstance, an assessment shall be completed by the regional center as soon as possible and within 30 days of admission. An individual program plan meeting shall be convened immediately following the assessment to determine the services and supports needed for stabilization and to develop a plan to transition the consumer from the facility into the community. If transition is not expected within 90 days of admission, an individual program plan meeting shall be held to discuss the status of transition and to determine if the consumer is still in need of placement in the facility. Commencing October 1, 2012, this determination shall be made after also considering resource options identified by the statewide specialized resource service. If it is determined that emergency services continue to be necessary, the regional center shall submit an updated transition plan that can cover a period of up to 90 days. In no event shall placements Placements under these emergency circumstances shall not exceed 180 days.(III) The clients’ rights advocate shall be notified of each admission and individual program planning meeting pursuant to this clause and may participate in all individual program planning meetings unless the consumer objects on their own behalf. For purposes of this subclause, notification to the clients’ rights advocate shall include a copy of the most recent comprehensive assessment or updated assessment and the time, date, and location of the meeting, and shall be provided as soon as practicable, but not less than seven calendar days before the meeting.(IV) If a consumer is placed in a mental health rehabilitation center by another entity, the mental health rehabilitation center shall inform the regional center of the placement within five days of the date the consumer is admitted. If an individual’s records indicate that the individual is a regional center consumer, the mental health rehabilitation center shall make every effort to contact the local regional center or the department to determine which regional center to provide notice. As soon as possible within 30 days of admission to a mental health rehabilitation center due to an emergency pursuant to subclause (II), or within 30 days of notification of admission to a mental health rehabilitation center by an entity other than a regional center, an assessment shall be completed by the regional center.(C) (i) Effective July 1, 2012, notwithstanding any other law or regulation, a regional center shall not purchase new residential services from, or place a consumer in, institutions for mental disease, as described in Part 5 (commencing with Section 5900) of Division 5, for which federal Medicaid funding is not available. Effective July 1, 2013, this prohibition applies regardless of the availability of federal funding.(ii) The prohibition described in clause (i) shall not apply to emergencies, as determined by the regional center, if a regional center cannot locate alternate services to meet the consumer’s needs. As soon as possible within 30 days of admission due to an emergency, an assessment shall be completed by the regional center. An individual program plan meeting shall be convened immediately following the assessment, to determine the services and supports needed for stabilization and to develop a plan to transition the consumer from the facility to the community. If transition is not expected within 90 days of admission, an emergency program plan meeting shall be held to discuss the status of the transition and to determine if the consumer is still in need of placement in the facility. If emergency services continue to be necessary, the regional center shall submit an updated transition plan to the department for an extension of up to 90 days. Placement shall not exceed 180 days.(iii) Effective January 1, 2020, the exception in clause (ii) shall no longer apply. As of this date, the prohibition in clause (i) shall not apply to acute crises when the following conditions are met prior to a regional center purchasing new residential services from, or placing a consumer in, an institution for mental disease:(I) The regional center prepares an assessment for inclusion in the consumer’s file detailing all considered community-based services and supports, including, but not limited to, rate adjustments, as provided by law, supplemental services, as set forth in subparagraph (F), emergency and crisis intervention services, as set forth in paragraph (11), community crisis home, pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 4698) of Chapter 6, and an explanation of why those options could not meet the consumer’s needs.(II) The director of the regional center confirms that there are no community-based options that can meet the consumer’s needs.(iv) For purposes of this section, “acute crisis” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 4418.7.(v) When admission occurs due to an acute crisis, all of the following shall apply:(I) If the regional center does not expect the consumer to transition back to a community setting within 72 hours, or if the consumer does not transition back to a community setting within 72 hours, the regional center shall do both of the following:(ia) No later than 10 calendar days from the date the consumer is placed in the institution for mental disease, complete any documentation necessary to support the filing of a petition for commitment pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 and request the person authorized to present allegations pursuant to Section 6500 file a petition for commitment.(ib) Complete a comprehensive assessment in coordination with the institution for mental disease staff. The comprehensive assessment shall include the identification of the services and supports needed for crisis stabilization and the timeline for identifying or developing the services and supports needed to transition the consumer back to a community setting. The regional center shall immediately submit a copy of the comprehensive assessment to the committing court. Immediately following the assessment, and not later than 30 days following admission, the regional center and the institution for mental disease shall jointly convene an individual program plan meeting to determine the services and supports needed for crisis stabilization and to develop a plan to transition the consumer into the community.(II) If transition is not expected within 90 days of admission, an individual program plan meeting shall be held to discuss the status of the transition and to determine if the consumer is still in need of crisis stabilization.(III) A consumer shall reside in an institution for mental disease no longer than six months before being placed into a community living arrangement, unless, prior to the end of the six months, all of the following have occurred:(ia) The regional center has conducted an additional comprehensive assessment based on current information and determines that the consumer continues to be in an acute crisis.(ib) The individual program planning team has developed a plan that identifies the specific services and supports necessary to transition the consumer into the community, and the plan includes a timeline to obtain or develop those services and supports.(ic) The committing court has reviewed and, if appropriate, extended the commitment.(IV) (ia) A consumer’s placement at an institution for mental disease shall not exceed one year unless both of the following occur:(Ia) The regional center demonstrates significant progress toward implementing the plan to transition the consumer into the community.(Ib) Extraordinary circumstances exist beyond the regional center’s control that have prevented the regional center from obtaining those services and supports within the timeline based on the plan.(ib) If both of the circumstances under sub-subclause (ia) exist, the regional center may request, and the committing court may grant, an additional extension of the commitment, not to exceed 30 days.(V) Institutions for mental disease staff shall assist the consumer with transitioning back to the consumer’s prior residence, or an alternative community-based residential setting, within the timeframe described in this subparagraph.(vi) The department shall monitor placements pursuant to this subparagraph and subsequent transitions back to community-based settings.(vii) The clients’ rights advocate shall be notified of each admission and individual program planning meeting pursuant to this subparagraph and may participate in all individual program planning meetings unless the consumer objects on their own behalf. For purposes of this clause, notification to the clients’ rights advocate shall include a copy of the most recent comprehensive assessment or updated assessment and the time, date, and location of the meeting, and shall be provided as soon as practicable, but not less than seven calendar days before the meeting.(viii) If a consumer is placed in an institution for mental disease by another entity, the institution for mental disease shall inform the regional center of the placement within five days of the date the consumer is admitted. If an individual’s records indicate that the individual is a regional center consumer, the institution for mental disease shall make every effort to contact the local regional center or department to determine which regional center to provide notice. As soon as possible within 30 days of admission to an institution for mental disease due to an acute crisis pursuant to clause (ii), or within 30 days of notification of admission to an institution for mental disease by an entity other than a regional center, an assessment shall be completed by the regional center.(ix) Regional centers shall complete a comprehensive assessment of a consumer residing in an institution for mental disease as of July 1, 2012, for which federal Medicaid funding is not available, and for a consumer residing in an institution for mental disease as of July 1, 2013, without regard to federal funding. The comprehensive assessment shall be completed before the consumer’s next scheduled individual program plan meeting and shall include identification of the services and supports needed and the timeline for identifying or developing those services needed to transition the consumer back to the community. Effective October 1, 2012, the regional center shall also consider resource options identified by the statewide specialized resource service. For each individual program plan meeting convened pursuant to this subparagraph, the clients’ rights advocate for the regional center shall be notified of the meeting and may participate in the meeting unless the consumer objects on their own behalf. For purposes of this clause, notification to the clients’ rights advocate shall include the time, date, and location of the meeting, and shall be provided as soon as practicable, but not less than seven calendar days before the meeting.(D) (i) The transition process from a mental health rehabilitation center or institution for mental disease shall be based upon the individual’s needs, developed through the individual program plan process, and shall ensure that needed services and supports will be in place at the time the individual moves. Individual supports and services shall include, if appropriate for the individual, wraparound services through intensive individualized support services. The transition shall be to a community living arrangement that is in the least restrictive environment appropriate to the needs of the individual and most protective of the individual’s rights to dignity, freedom, and choice as described in subdivision (a).(ii) Regional centers, through the individual program plan process, shall coordinate for the benefit of the regional center consumers residing in an institution for mental disease, pretransition planning, transition, and access to followup services to help ensure a smooth transition to the community. Individual support services shall include, but shall not be limited to, both of the following:(I) Defined regional center contacts and visits with consumers and service providers during the 12 months following the consumer’s movement date.(II) Identification of issues that need resolution and an individualized support plan to address these issues.(E) A person with developmental disabilities placed by the regional center in a community living arrangement shall have the rights specified in this division. These rights shall be brought to the person’s attention by any means necessary to reasonably communicate these rights to each resident, provided that, at a minimum, the Director State Department of Developmental Services prepare, provide, and require to be clearly posted in all residential facilities and day programs a poster using simplified language and pictures that is designed to be more understandable by persons with intellectual disabilities and that the rights information shall also be available through the regional center to each residential facility and day program in alternative formats, including, but not limited to, other languages, braille, and audiotapes, if necessary to meet the communication needs of consumers.(F) Consumers are eligible to receive supplemental services including, but not limited to, additional staffing, pursuant to the process described in subdivision (d) of Section 4646. Necessary additional staffing that is not specifically included in the rates paid to the service provider may be purchased by the regional center if the additional staff are in excess of the amount required by regulation and the individual’s planning team determines the additional services are consistent with the provisions of the individual program plan. Additional staff should be periodically reviewed by the planning team for consistency with the individual program plan objectives in order to determine if continued use of the additional staff is necessary and appropriate and if the service is producing outcomes consistent with the individual program plan. Regional centers shall monitor programs to ensure that the additional staff is being provided and utilized appropriately.(11) Emergency and crisis intervention services services, including, but not limited to, mental health services and behavior modification services, may be provided, as needed, to maintain persons with developmental disabilities in the living arrangement of their own choice. Crisis services shall first be provided without disrupting a person’s living arrangement. If crisis intervention services are unsuccessful, emergency housing shall be available in the person’s home community. If dislocation cannot be avoided, every effort shall be made to return the person to their living arrangement of choice, with all necessary supports, as soon as possible.(12) Among other service and support options, planning teams shall consider the use of paid roommates or neighbors, personal assistance, technical and financial assistance, and all other service and support options that would result in greater self-sufficiency for the consumer and cost-effectiveness to the state.(13) If facilitation as specified in an individual program plan requires the services of an individual, the facilitator shall be of the consumer’s choosing.(14) The community support may be provided to assist individuals with developmental disabilities to fully participate in community and civic life, including, but not limited to, programs, services, work opportunities, business, and activities available to persons without disabilities. This facilitation shall include, but not be limited to, any of the following:(A) Outreach and education to programs and services within the community.(B) Direct support to individuals that would enable them to more fully participate in their community.(C) Developing unpaid natural supports when possible.(15) If feasible and recommended by the individual program planning team, for purposes of facilitating better and cost-effective services for consumers or family members, technology, including telecommunication technology, may be used in conjunction with other services and supports. Technology in lieu of a consumer’s in-person appearances at judicial proceedings or administrative due process hearings may be used only if the consumer or, if appropriate, the consumer’s parent, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, gives informed consent. Technology may be used in lieu of, or in conjunction with, in-person training for providers, as appropriate.(16) Other services and supports may be provided as set forth in Sections 4685, 4686, 4687, 4688, and 4689, when necessary.(17) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, effective July 1, 2009, regional centers shall not purchase experimental treatments, therapeutic services, or devices that have not been clinically determined or scientifically proven to be effective or safe or for which risks and complications are unknown. Experimental treatments or therapeutic services include experimental medical or nutritional therapy when the use of the product for that purpose is not a general physician practice. For regional center consumers receiving these services as part of their individual program plan (IPP) or individualized family service plan (IFSP) on July 1, 2009, this prohibition shall apply on August 1, 2009.(b) (1) Advocacy for, and protection of, the civil, legal, and service rights of persons with developmental disabilities as established in this division.(2) If the advocacy efforts of a regional center to secure or protect the civil, legal, or service rights of a consumer prove ineffective, the regional center or the person with developmental disabilities or the person’s parents, legal guardian, or other representative may request advocacy assistance from the state council.(c) The regional center may assist consumers and families directly, or through a provider, in identifying and building circles of support within the community.(d) In order to increase the quality of community services and protect consumers, the regional center shall, if appropriate, take either of the following actions:(1) Identify services and supports that are ineffective or of poor quality and provide or secure consultation, training, or technical assistance services for an agency or individual provider to assist that agency or individual provider in upgrading the quality of services or supports.(2) Identify providers of services or supports that may not be in compliance with local, state, and federal statutes and regulations and notify the appropriate licensing or regulatory authority to investigate the possible noncompliance.(e) If necessary to expand the availability of needed services of good quality, a regional center may take actions that include, but are not limited to, the following:(1) Soliciting an individual or agency by requests for proposals or other means, to provide needed services or supports not presently available.(2) Requesting funds from the Program Development Fund, pursuant to Section 4677, or community placement plan funds designated from that fund, to reimburse the startup costs needed to initiate a new program of services and supports.(3) Using creative and innovative service delivery models, including, but not limited to, natural supports.(f) Except in emergency situations, a regional center shall not provide direct treatment and therapeutic services, but shall utilize appropriate public and private community agencies and service providers to obtain those services for its consumers.(g) If there are identified gaps in the system of services and supports consumers for whom no provider will provide services and supports contained in their individual program plan, the department may provide the services and supports directly.(h) At least annually, regional centers shall provide the consumer, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative a statement of services and supports the regional center purchased for the purpose of ensuring that they are delivered. The statement shall include the type, unit, month, and cost of services and supports purchased.SEC. 36. Section 4685.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4685.8. (a) The department shall implement a statewide Self-Determination Program. The Self-Determination Program shall be available in every regional center catchment area to provide participants and their families, within an individual budget, increased flexibility and choice, and greater control over decisions, resources, and needed and desired services and supports to implement their IPP. As of July 1, 2021, the program shall begin to be available on a voluntary basis to all regional center consumers who are eligible for the Self-Determination Program.(b) The department, in establishing the statewide program, shall do both of the following:(1) Set targets and benchmarks as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (r).(2) Address all of the following:(A) Oversight of expenditure of self-determined funds and the achievement of participant outcomes over time.(B) Increased participant control over which services and supports best meet the participant’s needs and the IPP objectives. A participant’s unique support system may include the purchase of existing service offerings from service providers or local businesses, hiring their own support workers, or negotiating unique service arrangements with local community resources.(C) Comprehensive person-centered planning, including an individual budget and services that are outcome based.(D) Consumer and family training to ensure understanding of the principles of self-determination, the planning process, and the management of budgets, services, and staff.(E) Choice of independent facilitators, who meet standards and certification requirements established by the department, and who can assist with the functions specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).(F) Choice of financial management services providers who meet standards and certification requirements established by the department, and who can carry out the functions specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).(G) Innovation that will more effectively allow participants to achieve their goals.(H) Long-term sustainability of the Self-Determination Program by doing all of the following:(i) Requiring IPP teams, when developing the individual budget, to determine the services, supports, and goods necessary for each consumer based on the needs and preferences of the consumer, and when appropriate the consumer’s family; the effectiveness of each option in meeting the goals specified in the IPP; the cost effectiveness of each option, as specified in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648; and the utilization of available generic services, as defined by the department.(ii) The department may review final individual budgets that are at or above a spending threshold determined by the department of all individual budgets and use information from its review in the aggregate to develop additional program guidance and verify compliance with federal and state laws and other requirements.(I) Reduce barriers to participation and improve equity in enrollment by establishing, with community input, no later than March 1, 2027, statewide standardized processes and procedures, including, but not limited to, timelines for these processes and procedures. Input from the community shall include, but not be limited to, consultation with the department’s Lived Experience Advisory Group, individuals and families, caregivers, advocates and associations, service providers, regional centers, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities Statewide Self‑Determination Advisory Committee, and legislative staff and shall include adequate notice, or 45 days at a minimum, for the community to review and provide feedback on draft processes and procedures, with review and consideration by the department of feedback prior to finalization for the March 1, 2027, deadline. The standardized processes and procedures shall be consistently applied by regional centers. The standardized processes and procedures shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(i) Enrollment.(ii) Individual budgets.(iii) Spending plans.(iv) Financial management services.(v) Access to transition supports.(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Financial management services” means services or functions that assist the participant to manage and direct the distribution of funds contained in the individual budget, and ensure that the participant has the financial resources to implement their IPP throughout the year. These may include bill paying services and activities that facilitate the employment of service and support workers by the participant, including, but not limited to, fiscal accounting, tax withholding, compliance with relevant state and federal employment laws, assisting the participant in verifying provider qualifications, including criminal background checks, and expenditure reports. The financial management services provider shall meet the applicable requirements of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations and other specific qualifications or certifications established by the department.(2) “Independent facilitator” means a person, selected and directed by the participant, who is not otherwise providing services to the participant pursuant to their IPP and is not employed by a person providing services to the participant. The independent facilitator may assist the participant in making informed decisions about the individual budget, and in locating, accessing, and coordinating services and supports consistent with the participant’s IPP. The independent facilitator is available to assist in identifying immediate and long-term needs, developing options to meet those needs, leading, participating, or advocating on behalf of the participant in the person-centered planning process and development of the IPP, and obtaining identified services and supports. The cost of the independent facilitator, if any, shall be paid by the participant out of the participant’s individual budget. An independent facilitator shall receive training in the principles of self-determination, the person-centered planning process, and the other responsibilities described in this paragraph at the independent facilitator’s own cost. The independent facilitator shall meet standards and certification requirements established by the department.(3) “Individual budget” means the amount of regional center purchase of service funding available to the participant for the purchase of services and supports necessary to implement the IPP. The individual budget shall be determined using a fair, equitable, and transparent methodology.(4) “IPP” means individual program plan, as described in Section 4646.(5) “Participant” means an individual, and when appropriate, the participant’s parents, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative, who has been deemed eligible for, and has voluntarily agreed to participate in, the Self-Determination Program.(6) “Self-determination” means a voluntary delivery system consisting of a defined and comprehensive mix of services and supports, selected and directed by a participant through person-centered planning, in order to meet the objectives in their IPP. Self-determination services and supports are designed to assist the participant to achieve personally defined outcomes in community settings that promote inclusion. The Self-Determination Program shall only fund services and supports provided pursuant to this division that the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services determines are eligible for federal financial participation.(7) “Spending plan” means the plan the participant develops to use their available individual budget funds to purchase goods, services, and supports necessary to implement their individual program plan (IPP). The spending plan shall identify the cost of each good, service, and support that will be purchased with regional center funds. The total amount of the spending plan cannot exceed the amount of the individual budget. A copy of the spending plan shall be attached to the participant’s IPP.(d) Participation in the Self-Determination Program is fully voluntary. A participant may choose to participate in, and may choose to leave, the Self-Determination Program at any time. A regional center shall not require or prohibit participation in the Self-Determination Program as a condition of eligibility for, or the delivery of, services and supports otherwise available under this division. Participation in the Self-Determination Program shall be available to any regional center consumer who meets the following eligibility requirements:(1) The participant has a developmental disability, as defined in Section 4512, and is receiving services pursuant to this division.(2) The consumer does not live in a licensed long-term health care facility, as defined in paragraph (44) of subdivision (a) of Section 54302 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations. An individual, and when appropriate the individual’s parent, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative, who is not eligible to participate in the Self-Determination Program pursuant to this paragraph may request that the regional center provide person-centered planning services in order to make arrangements for transition to the Self-Determination Program, provided that the individual is reasonably expected to transition to the community within 90 days. In that case, the regional center shall initiate person-centered planning services within 60 days of that request.(3) The participant agrees to all of the following terms and conditions:(A) The participant shall receive an orientation that meets the standards set or developed by the department to the Self-Determination Program prior to enrollment, which includes the principles of self-determination, the role of the independent facilitator and the financial management services provider, person-centered planning, and development of a budget.(B) The participant shall utilize the services and supports available within the Self-Determination Program only when generic services and supports are not available.(C) The participant shall only purchase services and supports necessary to implement their IPP and shall comply with any and all other terms and conditions for participation in the Self-Determination Program described in this section.(D) The participant shall manage Self-Determination Program services and supports within the participant’s individual budget.(E) The participant shall utilize the services of a financial management services provider of their own choosing and who is vendored by a regional center and who meets the qualifications in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).(F) The participant may utilize the services of an independent facilitator of their own choosing for the purpose of providing services and functions as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c). If the participant elects not to use an independent facilitator, the participant may use their regional center service coordinator to provide the services and functions described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).(G) If eligible, with the assistance of the regional center, if needed, timely apply for Medi-Cal in order to maximize federal funding. The participant may consider institutional deeming in order to qualify for Medi-Cal services.(e) A participant who is not Medi-Cal eligible may participate in the Self-Determination Program and receive self-determination services and supports if all other program eligibility requirements are met and the services and supports are otherwise eligible for federal financial participation.(f) (1) The additional federal financial participation funds generated by the former participants of the self-determination pilot projects authorized pursuant to Section 13 of Chapter 1043 of the Statutes of 1998, as amended, or pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 4669.2) of Chapter 5, shall be used to maximize the ability of Self-Determination Program participants to direct their own lives and to ensure the department and regional centers successfully implement the program as follows: by offsetting the cost of criminal background checks conducted pursuant to subdivision (v) and other administrative costs incurred in implementing the Self-Determination Program, inclusive of support for the Statewide Self-Determination Advisory Committee established pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (w).(1)First, to offset the cost to the department for the criminal background check conducted pursuant to subdivision (v) and other administrative costs incurred by the department in implementing the Self-Determination Program.(2)With the remaining funds, the department, in consultation with stakeholders, including a statewide self-determination advisory workgroup, shall prioritize the use of the funds to meet the needs of participants, increase service access and equity, and reduce disparities, and to implement the program, including costs associated with all of the following:(A)Independent facilitators to assist with a participant’s initial person-centered planning meeting.(B)Development of the participant’s initial individual budget.(C)Joint training of consumers, family members, regional center staff, and members of the local volunteer advisory committee established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (w).(D)Regional center operations to increase support for transition to the Self-Determination Program or for caseload ratio enhancement.(E)To offset the costs to the regional centers in implementing the Self-Determination Program.(F)To support the Statewide Self-Determination Advisory Committee established pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (w).(2) Commencing July 1, 2026, up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) of the funds reappropriated in the Budget Act of 2026 shall be available each fiscal year through June 30, 2030, for the department, in consultation with stakeholders identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (w), to meet the needs of participants, increase service access and equity, and reduce disparities, including costs associated with both of the following:(A) Development and delivery of standardized statewide training approved by the department for individuals, family members, and members of the local volunteer advisory committee established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (w).(B) Local community resource fairs that provide standardized information about the Self-Determination Program.(3) Commencing July 1, 2030, and subject to an appropriation of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) for these purposes, funds shall be made available to the department for the activities described in paragraph (2).(g) If at any time during participation in the Self-Determination Program a regional center determines that a participant is no longer eligible to continue in, or a participant voluntarily chooses to exit, the Self-Determination Program, the regional center shall provide for the participant’s transition from the Self-Determination Program to other services and supports. This transition shall include the development of a new IPP that reflects the services and supports necessary to meet the individual’s needs. The regional center shall ensure that there is no gap in services and supports during the transition period.(h) An individual determined to be ineligible for or who voluntarily exits the Self-Determination Program shall be permitted to return to the Self-Determination Program upon meeting all applicable eligibility criteria and upon approval of the participant’s planning team, as described in subdivision (j) of Section 4512. An individual who has voluntarily exited the Self-Determination Program shall not return to the program for at least 12 months.(i) An individual who participates in the Self-Determination Program may elect to continue to receive self-determination services and supports if the individual transfers to another regional center catchment area, provided that the individual remains eligible for the Self-Determination Program pursuant to subdivision (d). The balance of the participant’s individual budget shall be reallocated to the regional center to which the participant transfers.(j) The IPP team shall utilize the person-centered planning process to develop the IPP for a participant. The IPP shall detail the goals and objectives of the participant that are to be met through the purchase of participant-selected services and supports. The IPP team shall determine the individual budget to ensure the budget assists the participant to achieve the outcomes set forth in the participant’s IPP and ensures their health and safety. The completed individual budget shall be attached to the IPP.(k) The participant shall implement their IPP, including choosing and purchasing the services and supports allowable under this section necessary to implement the plan. A regional center shall not prohibit the purchase of any service or support that is otherwise allowable under this section.(l) A participant shall have all the rights established in Sections 4646 to 4646.6, inclusive, and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4700).(m) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (4), the IPP team shall determine the initial and any revised individual budget for the participant using the following methodology:(A) (i) Except as specified in clause (ii), for a participant who is a current consumer of the regional center, their initial individual budget shall be the total amount of the most recently available 12 months of purchase of service authorizations, services authorized by the IPP team but not currently provided in a purchase of service authorization, less services paid for by the regional center outside of the self-determination program and one-time expenses. The IPP team shall discuss unmet needs for participants with no or low purchases of services.(ii) An adjustment may be made to the amount specified in clause (i) if both of the following occur:(I) The IPP team determines that an adjustment to this amount is necessary due to a change in the participant’s circumstances, needs, or resources. When adjusting the budget, the IPP team shall document the specific reason for the adjustment in the IPP.(II) The regional center certifies on the individual budget document that regional center expenditures for the individual budget, including any adjustment, would have occurred regardless of the individual’s participation in the Self-Determination Program.(iii) For purposes of clauses (i) and (ii), the amount of the individual budget shall not be increased to cover the cost of the independent facilitator.(B) For a participant who is either newly eligible for regional center services or who does not have 12 months of services included in the current IPP, the participant’s individual budget shall be calculated as follows:(i) The IPP team shall identify the services and supports needed by the participant and available resources, as required by Section 4646.(ii) The regional center shall calculate the cost of providing the services and supports to be purchased by the regional center by using the average cost paid by the regional center for each service or support unless the regional center determines that the consumer has a unique need that requires a higher or lower cost. The IPP team also shall document the specific reason for the adjustment in the IPP. The regional center shall certify on the individual budget document that this amount would have been expended using regional center purchase of service funds regardless of the individual’s participation in the Self-Determination Program.(iii) For purposes of clauses (i) and (ii), the amount of the individual budget shall not be increased to cover the cost of the independent facilitator.(2) The amount of the individual budget shall be available to the participant each year for the purchase of program services and supports. An individual budget shall be calculated no more than once in a 12-month period, unless revised to reflect a change in circumstances, needs, or resources of the participant using the process specified in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).(3) The spending plan shall be assigned to uniform budget categories developed by the department in consultation with stakeholders and distributed according to the timing of the anticipated expenditures in the IPP and in a manner that ensures that the participant has the financial resources to implement the IPP throughout the year.(4) The department, in consultation with stakeholders, may develop alternative methodologies for individual budgets that are computed in a fair, transparent, and equitable manner and are based on consumer characteristics and needs, and that include a method for adjusting individual budgets to address a participant’s change in circumstances or needs.(n) Participants may transfer funds between service codes and budget categories upon the approval of the regional center or the participant’s IPP team. The regional center shall provide timely authorizations to the participant’s financial management service.(o) Consistent with the implementation date of the IPP, the IPP team shall annually ascertain from the participant whether there are any circumstances or needs that require a change to the annual individual budget. Based on that review, the IPP team shall calculate a new individual budget consistent with the methodology identified in subdivision (m).(p) (1) The department, as it determines necessary, may adopt regulations to implement the procedures set forth in this section. Any regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and only to the extent that all necessary federal approvals are obtained, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of program directives or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. It is the intent of the Legislature that the department be allowed this temporary authority as necessary to implement program changes only until completion of the regulatory process.(q) The department, in consultation with stakeholders, shall develop informational materials about the Self-Determination Program. The department shall ensure that regional centers are trained in the principles of self-determination, the mechanics of the Self-Determination Program, and the rights of consumers and families as candidates for, and participants in, the Self-Determination Program.(r) Each regional center shall be responsible for implementing the Self-Determination Program as a term of its contract under Section 4629. As part of implementing the program, the regional center shall do all of the following:(1) Meet the Self-Determination targets approved by the department, meet benchmarks established by the department in areas including timely enrollment, diversity of consumers served, and reduction of disparities in the individual budget of participants from racial and ethnic communities, and be eligible for incentives for exceeding these targets and benchmarks once the department has established a performance incentives program.(2) Develop and implement an outreach and training plan about the Self-Determination program for the diverse communities served by the regional center, including in congregate settings. Information shall be provided in plain language, in alternative formats and alternative modes of communication and provide language access as required by state and federal law. Obtain input from stakeholders, including consumers and families that reflect the ethnic and language diversity of the regional center’s consumers, about the effectiveness of this outreach and training and other activities that may be effective in reducing disparities in these programs.(3) Annually report the enrollment, individual budget data, and purchase of service expenditure data for the Self-Determination Program consistent with the criteria in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 4519.5.(4) Assist eligible participants and their families in applying for Medi-Cal, in order to maximize federal funding and assist interested participants who wish to pursue institutional deeming in order to qualify for Medi-Cal services.(5) At least annually, in addition to annual certification, conduct an additional review of all final individual budgets for participants at the regional center which are at or above a spending threshold that is specified by the department through directive consistent with federal and state requirements. This information may be used in the aggregate to provide training, program guidance, and verify compliance with state and federal requirements.(6) Certify the spending plan to verify that goods and services satisfy all of the following:(A) Address the individual’s desired outcomes identified in the individual program plan.(B) Are not available from generic services, as defined by the department.(C) Are eligible for federal financial participation.(7) Contract with local consumer or family-run organizations and consult with the local volunteer advisory committee established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (w) to conduct outreach through local meetings or forums to consumers and their families to provide information about the Self-Determination Program and to help ensure that the program is available to a diverse group of participants, with special outreach to underserved communities.(8) Collaborate with the local consumer or family-run organizations identified in paragraph (1) to jointly conduct training about the Self-Determination Program. The regional center shall consult with the local volunteer advisory committee established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (w) in planning for the training, and the local volunteer advisory committee may designate members to represent the advisory committee at the training.(9) Train all service coordinators and fair hearing specialists in the principles of self-determination, the mechanics of the Self-Determination Program, and the rights of consumers and families. The training shall be conducted in collaboration with the local volunteer advisory committee.(10) Provide payment to the financial management services provider for spending plan expenses through a not less than semi-monthly pay schedule.(s) The financial management services provider shall provide the participant and the regional center service coordinator with a monthly individual budget statement that describes the amount of funds allocated by budget category, the amount spent in the previous 30-day period, and the amount of funding that remains available under the participant’s individual budget.(t) Only the financial management services provider is required to apply for vendorization in accordance with Subchapter 2 (commencing with Section 54300) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations for the Self-Determination Program. All other service and support providers shall not be on the federal debarment list and shall have applicable state licenses, certifications, or other state required documentation, including documentation of any other qualifications required by the department, but are exempt from the vendorization requirements set forth in Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations when serving participants in the Self-Determination Program.(u) The regional center shall pay the full costs of the participant’s financial management services provider.(v) To protect the health and safety of participants in the Self-Determination Program, the department shall require a criminal background check in accordance with all of the following:(1) The department shall issue a program directive that identifies nonvendored providers of services and supports who shall obtain a criminal background check pursuant to this subdivision. At a minimum, these staff shall include both of the following:(A) Individuals who provide direct personal care services to a participant.(B) Other nonvendored providers of services and supports for whom a criminal background check is requested by a participant or the participant’s financial management service.(2) Subject to the procedures and requirements of this subdivision, the department shall administer criminal background checks consistent with the department’s authority and the process described in Sections 4689.2 to 4689.6, inclusive.(3) The department shall electronically submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of nonvendored providers of services and supports, as specified in paragraph (1), for purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and state or federal arrests and also information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial or appeal.(4) When received, the Department of Justice shall forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation requests for federal summary criminal history information received pursuant to this section. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the department.(5) The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal response to the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(6) The department shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons described in paragraph (1).(7) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the request described in this subdivision.(8) The fingerprints of any provider of services and supports who is required to obtain a criminal background check shall be submitted to the Department of Justice prior to employment. The costs of the fingerprints and the financial management service’s administrative cost authorized by the department shall be paid by the services and supports provider or the provider’s employing agency. Any administrative costs incurred by the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be offset by the funds specified in subdivision (g).(9) If the criminal record information report shows a criminal history, the department shall take the steps specified in Section 4689.2. The department may prohibit a provider of services and supports from becoming employed, or continuing to be employed, based on the criminal background check, as authorized in Section 4689.6. The provider of services and supports who has been denied employment shall have the rights set forth in Section 4689.6.(10) The department may utilize a current department-issued criminal record clearance to enable a provider to serve more than one participant, as long as the criminal record clearance has been processed through the department and no subsequent arrest notifications have been received relative to the cleared applicant.(11) Consistent with subdivision (h) of Section 4689.2, the participant or financial management service that denies or terminates employment based on written notification from the department shall not incur civil liability or unemployment insurance liability.(w) To ensure the effective implementation of the Self-Determination Program and facilitate the sharing of best practices and training materials commencing with the implementation of the Self-Determination Program, local and statewide advisory committees shall be established as follows:(1) Each regional center shall establish a local volunteer advisory committee to provide oversight of the Self-Determination Program and identify a regional center liaison to the committee. The regional center and the State Council on Developmental Disabilities shall each appoint one-half of the membership of the committee. The committee shall consist of the regional center clients’ rights advocate, consumers, family members, and other advocates, and community leaders, including a representative from a family resource center. A majority of the committee shall be consumers and their family members. The committee shall reflect the multicultural diversity and geographic profile of the catchment area. The committee shall review the development and ongoing progress of the Self-Determination Program, including whether the program advances the principles of self-determination and is operating consistent with the requirements of this section, and may make ongoing recommendations for improvement to the regional center and the department. Annually, the regional center shall confirm, in writing, that the committee meets the requirements specified in this paragraph and provide the department with the name of the staff liaison and the names of the committee members, the positions they fill on the committee, and which entity appointed them to the committee.(2) The State Council on Developmental Disabilities shall form a volunteer committee, to be known as the Statewide Self-Determination Advisory Committee, comprised of the chairs of the 21 local advisory committees or their designees. The council shall convene the Statewide Self-Determination Advisory Committee twice annually, or more frequently in the sole discretion of the council. The Statewide Self-Determination Advisory Committee shall meet by teleconference or other means established by the council to identify self-determination best practices, effective consumer and family training materials, implementation concerns, systemic issues, ways to enhance the program, and recommendations regarding the most effective method for participants to learn of individuals who are available to provide services and supports. The council shall synthesize information received from the Statewide Self-Determination Advisory Committee, local advisory committees, and other sources, share the information with consumers, families, regional centers, and the department, and make recommendations, as appropriate, to increase the program’s effectiveness in furthering the principles of self-determination.(x) The department shall annually provide the following information to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature:(1) Number and characteristics of participants, by regional center, including the number of participants who entered the program upon movement from a developmental center.(2) Types and amount of services and supports purchased under the Self-Determination Program, by regional center.(3) Range and average of individual budgets, by regional center, including adjustments to the budget to address the adjustments permitted in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (m).(4) The number and outcome of appeals concerning individual budgets, by regional center.(5) The number and outcome of fair hearing appeals, by regional center.(6) The number of participants who voluntarily withdraw from the Self-Determination Program and a summary of the reasons why, by regional center.(7) The number of participants who are subsequently determined to no longer be eligible for the Self-Determination Program and a summary of the reasons why, by regional center.(y) (1) The State Council on Developmental Disabilities shall issue an interim report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, no later than June 30, 2021, on the status of the Self-Determination Program authorized by this section, barriers to its implementation, and recommendations to enhance the effectiveness of the program. The interim report shall provide an update to the program’s status, each regional center’s cap on participation and progress toward that cap, the most recent statewide and per-regional-center participant count, and the historical trend in the statewide participation count since the start of the program. The department shall assist in providing available information to the council in order to facilitate the timely issuance of the report.(2) The council, in collaboration with the protection and advocacy agency identified in Section 4900 and the federally funded University Centers for Excellence in Developmental Disabilities Education, Research, and Service, may work with regional centers to survey participants regarding participant satisfaction under the Self-Determination Program and, when data is available, the traditional service delivery system, including the proportion of participants who report that their choices and decisions are respected and supported and who report that they are able to recruit and hire qualified service providers, and to identify barriers to participation and recommendations for improvement.(3) The council, in collaboration with the protection and advocacy agency identified in Section 4900 and the federally funded University Centers for Excellence in Developmental Disabilities Education, Research, and Service, shall issue a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, by June 30, 2023, on the status of the Self-Determination Program authorized by this section, and provide recommendations to enhance the effectiveness of the program. This review shall include the program’s effectiveness in furthering the principles of self-determination, including all of the following:(A) Freedom, which includes the ability of adults with developmental disabilities to exercise the same rights as all citizens to establish, with freely chosen supporters, family and friends, where they want to live, with whom they want to live, how their time will be occupied, and who supports them; and for families to have the freedom to receive unbiased assistance of their own choosing when developing a plan and to select all personnel and supports to further the life goals of a minor child.(B) Authority, which includes the ability of a person with a disability, or family, to control a certain sum of dollars in order to purchase services and supports of their choosing.(C) Support, which includes the ability to arrange resources and personnel, both formal and informal, that will assist a person with a disability to live a life in the community that is rich in community participation and contributions.(D) Responsibility, which includes the ability of participants to take responsibility for decisions in their own lives and to be accountable for the use of public dollars, and to accept a valued role in their community through, for example, competitive employment, organizational affiliations, spiritual development, and general caring of others in their community.(E) Confirmation, which includes confirmation of the critical role of participants and their families in making decisions in their own lives and designing and operating the system that they rely on.SEC. 37. Section 4688.21 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4688.21. (a) The Legislature places a high priority on opportunities for adults with developmental disabilities to choose and customize day services to meet their individualized needs; have opportunities to further the development and support of employment and volunteer activities; direct their services; pursue postsecondary education; establish and support paid internship program opportunities; and increase their ability to lead integrated and inclusive lives. To further these goals, a consumer may choose a tailored day service or vouchered community-based training service, in lieu of, or in conjunction with, any other regional center vendored day program, look-alike day program, supported employment program, or work activity program.(b) (1) A tailored day service shall include an individualized service design, as determined through the individual program plan (IPP), and developed through a person-centered planning process that reflects and maximizes individual preferences and goals, and approved by the regional center. This service design may include, but may not be limited to, the following:(A) Fewer days or hours than in the program’s approved day program, look-alike day program, supported employment program, or work activity program design.(B) Flexibility in the duration, location, including by remote electronic communications, and intensity of services to meet the consumer’s individualized needs.(C) Prioritize the development or support of competitive, integrated employment, volunteer activities, or pursuit of postsecondary education; establish and support paid internship program opportunities; maximize consumer direction of the service; and increase the consumer’s ability to lead an integrated and inclusive life.(2) The type and amount of tailored day service shall be determined through the IPP process, pursuant to Section 4646. The IPP shall contain, but not be limited to, the following:(A) A detailed description of the consumer’s individualized choices and needs and how these choices and needs will be met.(B) The type and amount of services and staffing needed to meet the consumer’s individualized choices and needs, and unique health and safety and other needs.(3) The staffing requirements set forth in Section 55756 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations and subdivision (p) of Section 4851 of this code shall not apply to a tailored day service.(4) Commencing July 1, 2022, until June 30, 2025, inclusive, for vendored programs wishing to offer a tailored day service option, the hourly rate for the tailored day service option shall be calculated using a base rate, defined as twice the amount of the rate model or models for “Community-Based Day, Community Only, 1:2.” The calculation of the rate shall be as follows:(A) Effective July 1, 2022, the hourly rate shall equal 80 percent of the base rate.(B) The rate established in subparagraph (A) shall remain in effect pending the department’s review, in coordination with stakeholders, of implementation of this section, as amended by the act that added this paragraph. The review, to be completed by June 30, 2024, shall include development of recommendations that may include, but not be limited to, modifying the scope of the service or establishing a rate model specific to the service. The department shall provide an update to the Legislature on the status of the review no later than January 10, 2024.(5) Commencing on July 1, 2025, for vendored programs wishing to offer a tailored day service option, the hourly rate for the tailored day service option shall be set by the department and posted on its internet website.(6) The hold harmless policy defined in subdivision (d) of Section 4519.10 shall apply for vendored programs offering a tailored day service as of June 30, 2022, with an hourly rate that exceeds the rate calculated pursuant to this subdivision.(7) Tailored day services shall not be delivered on the same day as any other regional center vendored day program, look-alike day program, supported employment program, or work activity program unless all of the following apply:(A) A consumer has a plan identified in their individual program plan for transitioning from a work activity program to competitive integrated employment, paid internship, or postsecondary education.(B) The transition plan is developed through a person-centered planning process that reflects and maximizes individual preferences and goals.(C) The duration of the delivery of tailored day services on the same day or days as a work activity program or supported employment services is no longer than six months.(8) Tailored day services may be delivered on the same day as supported employment individual placement services.(8)(9) The total monthly hours of tailored day services shall not exceed the number of days in the month tailored day services are authorized, multiplied by four.(9)(10) The regional center shall ensure that the vendor is capable of complying with, and will comply with, the consumer’s IPP, individual choice, and health and safety needs.(10)(11) Effective July 1, 2011, and prior to the time of development, review, or modification of a consumer’s IPP, regional centers shall provide information about tailored day service to eligible adult consumers. A consumer may request information about tailored day services from the regional center at any time and may request an IPP meeting to secure those services.(c) (1) A vouchered community-based training service is defined as a consumer-directed service that assists the consumer in the development of skills required for competitive integrated employment, the paid internship program, participation in volunteer activities, or any combination of these, and the assistance necessary for the consumer to secure employment, a paid internship, or volunteer positions or pursue secondary education.(2) Implementation of vouchered community-based training service is contingent upon the approval of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.(3) Vouchered community-based training service shall be provided in natural environments in the community, separate from the consumer’s residence.(4) A consumer, parent, or conservator vendored as a vouchered community-based training service shall utilize the services of a financial management services (FMS) entity. The regional center shall provide information about available financial management services and shall assist the consumer in selecting a FMS vendor to act as coemployer.(5) A parent or conservator shall not be the direct support worker employed by the vouchered community-based training service vendor.(6) If the direct support worker is required to transport the consumer, the vouchered community-based training service vendor shall verify that the direct support worker can transport the consumer safely and has a valid California driver’s license and proof of insurance.(7) The rate for vouchered community-based training service shall be the most recent rate posted on the department’s public internet website. The rate includes employer-related taxes and all transportation needed to implement the service, except as described in paragraph (8). The rate does not include the cost of the FMS.(8) A consumer vendored as a vouchered community-based training service shall also be eligible for a regional center-funded bus pass, if appropriate and needed.(9) Vouchered community-based training service shall be limited to a maximum of 150 hours per quarter. The services to be provided and the service hours shall be documented in the consumer’s IPP.(10) A direct support worker of vouchered community-based training service shall be an adult who possesses the skill, training, and experience necessary to provide services in accordance with the IPP.(11) Effective July 1, 2011, and prior to the time of development, review, or modification of a consumer’s IPP, regional centers shall provide information about vouchered community-based training service to eligible adult consumers.(12) The type and amount of vouchered community-based training service shall be determined through the IPP process pursuant to Section 4646. The IPP shall contain, but not be limited to, the following:(A) A detailed description of the consumer’s individualized choices and needs and how these choices and needs will be met.(B) The type and amount of services and staffing needed to meet the consumer’s individualized choices and unique health and safety and other needs.(d) The department may adopt emergency regulations for tailored day service or vouchered community-based training service. The adoption, amendment, repeal, or readoption of a regulation authorized by this subdivision is deemed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe specific facts showing the need for immediate action. A certificate of compliance for these implementing regulations shall be filed within 24 months following the adoption of the first emergency regulations filed pursuant to this subdivision.SEC. 38. Section 4689.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4689.1. (a) The Legislature declares that it places a high priority on providing opportunities for adults with developmental disabilities to live with families approved by family home agencies and to receive services and supports in those settings as determined by the individual program plan. Family home agencies may offer services and supports in family homes or family teaching homes. All requirements of this section and Sections 4689.2 to 4689.6, inclusive, shall apply to a family home and a family teaching home.(b) For purposes of this section, “family home” means a home that is owned, leased, or rented by, and is the family residence of, the family home provider or providers, and in which services and supports are provided to a maximum of two adults with developmental disabilities regardless of their degree of disability, and who do not require continuous skilled nursing care.(c) For purposes of this section, “family teaching home” means a home that is owned, leased, or rented by the family home agency wherein the family home provider and the individual have independent residences, either contiguous or attached, and in which services and supports are provided to a maximum of three adults with developmental disabilities regardless of their degree of disability, and who do not require continuous skilled nursing care.(d) For purposes of this section, “family home agency” means a private for-profit or not-for-profit agency that is vendored to do all of the following:(1) Recruit, approve, train, and monitor family home providers.(2) Provide social services and in-home support to family home providers.(3) Assist adults with developmental disabilities in moving into approved family homes.(e) For purposes of ensuring that regional centers may secure high-quality services that provide supports in natural settings and promote inclusion and meaningful participation in community life for adults with developmental disabilities, the department shall promulgate regulations for family home agencies, family teaching homes, and family homes that shall include, but not be limited to, standards and requirements related to all of the following:(1) Selection criteria for regional centers to apply in vendoring family home agencies, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) The need for service.(B) The experience of the agency or key personnel in providing the same or comparable services.(C) The reasonableness of the agency’s overhead.(D) The capability of the regional center to monitor and evaluate the vendor.(2) Vendorization.(3) Operation of family home agencies, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) Recruitment.(B) Approval of family homes.(C) Qualifications, training, and monitoring of family home providers.(D) Assistance to consumers in moving into approved family homes.(E) The range of services and supports to be provided.(F) Family home agency staffing levels, qualifications, and training.(4) Program design.(5) Program and consumer records.(6) Family homes.(7) (A) Rates of payment for family home agencies and approved family home providers. Regional center reimbursement to family home agencies for services in a family home shall not exceed rates established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4681.5 for individuals who reside in a community care facility, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, that is vendored for four beds or fewer.(B) (i) The department may establish a distinct service code and rate model for the family teaching home that is separate from the service code and rate model for the family home agency and that considers costs for housing, staffing, and census.(ii) If the department establishes a distinct service code and rate model pursuant to clause (i), the department shall post the service code and rate model on its internet website.(iii) A family home agency that provides a family teaching home shall use the service code and rate model described in clause (i) for the family teaching home, if established by the department.(8) The department and regional center’s monitoring and evaluation of the family home agency and approved homes, which shall be designed to ensure that services do all of the following:(A) Conform to applicable laws and regulations and provide for the consumer’s health and well-being.(B) Assist the consumer in understanding and exercising their individual rights.(C) Are consistent with the family home agency’s program design and the consumer’s individual program plan.(D) Maximize the consumer’s opportunities to have choices in where the consumer lives, works, and socializes.(E) Provide a supportive family home environment, available to the consumer 24 hours per day, that is clean, comfortable, and accommodating to the consumer’s cultural preferences, values, and lifestyle.(F) Are satisfactory to the consumer, as indicated by the consumer’s quality of life as assessed by the consumer, their family, and, if appointed, conservator, or significant others, or all of these, as well as by evaluation of outcomes relative to individual program plan objectives.(9) Monthly monitoring visits by family home agency social service staff to approved family homes and family teaching homes.(10) Procedures whereby the regional center and the department may enforce applicable provisions of law and regulation, investigate allegations of abuse or neglect, and impose sanctions on family home agencies and approved family homes and family teaching homes, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) Requiring movement of a consumer from a family home under specified circumstances.(B) Termination of approval of a family home or family teaching home.(C) Termination of the family home agency’s vendorization.(11) Appeal procedures.(f) Each adult with developmental disabilities placed in a family home or family teaching home shall have the rights specified in this division, including, but not limited to, the rights specified in Section 4503.(g) Prior to placement in a family home of an adult with developmental disabilities who has a conservator, consent of the conservator shall be obtained.(h) The adoption of any emergency regulations to implement this section that are filed with the Office of Administrative Law within one year of the date on which the act that added this section took effect shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.SEC. 39. Section 4689.9 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:4689.9. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to establish that hourly workers providing supported living services to individuals served by regional centers have a right to overtime compensation for all hours worked over 40 hours per workweek.(b) Notwithstanding any other state or federal law or regulation concerning overtime pay, including but not limited to, federal regulations implementing the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 201 et seq.), hourly workers who provide supported living services, as defined in Section 54302(a)(71) of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, to individuals served by regional centers, as defined in Section 54302(a)(54) of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, and who are employed by a vendor, as defined in Section 54302(a)(74) of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, shall be compensated for overtime at the rate of one and one-half times the employee’s regular rate of pay for all hours worked over 40 hours per workweek. Unless a vendor specifies otherwise, a workweek is defined as beginning at 12:00 a.m. on Sunday and terminating at 11:59 p.m. the following Saturday.SEC. 40. Section 4691 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4691. (a) The Legislature reaffirms its intent that community-based day programs be planned and provided as part of a continuum of services to enable persons with developmental disabilities to approximate the pattern of everyday living available to people of the same age without disabilities. The Legislature further intends that standards be developed to ensure high-quality services, and that equitable ratesetting procedures based upon those standards be established, maintained, and revised, as necessary. The Legislature intends that ratesetting procedures be developed for all community-based day programs, which include adult development centers, activity centers, infant day programs, behavior management programs, social recreational programs, and independent living programs.(b) For the purpose of ensuring that regional centers may secure high-quality services for persons with developmental disabilities, the State Department of Developmental Services shall promulgate regulations establishing program standards and an equitable process for setting rates of state payment for community-based day programs. These regulations shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1) The standards and requirements related to the operation of the program including, but not limited to, staff qualifications, staff-to-client ratios, client entrance and exit criteria, program design, program evaluation, program and client records and documentation, client placement, and personnel requirements and functions.(2) The allowable cost components of the program including salary and wages, staff benefits, operating expenses, and management organization costs where two or more programs are operated by a separate and distinct corporation or entity.(3) The rate determination processes for establishing rates, based on the allowable costs of the allowable cost components. Different rate determination processes may be developed for establishing rates for new and existing programs, and for the initial and subsequent years of implementation of the regulations. The processes shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(A) The procedure for identification and grouping of programs by type of day program and approved staff-to-client ratio.(B) The requirements for an identification of the program, cost, and other information, if any, which the program is required to submit to the department or the regional center, the consequences, if any, for failure to do so, and the timeframes and format for submission and review.(C) The ratesetting methodology.(D) A procedure for adjusting rates as a result of anticipated and unanticipated program changes and fiscal audits of the program and a procedure for appealing rates, including the timeframes for the program to request an adjustment or appeal, and for the department to respond.(E) A procedure for increasing established rates and the allowable range of rates due to cost-of-living adjustments.(F) A procedure for increasing established rates as a result of Budget Act appropriations made pursuant to the ratesetting methodology established pursuant to Section 4691.5 and subdivision (c) of this section.The department shall develop these regulations in consultation with representatives from organizations representing the developmental services system as determined by the department. The State Council on Developmental Disabilities, and other organizations representing regional centers, providers, and clients shall have an opportunity to review and comment upon the proposed regulations prior to their promulgation. The department shall promulgate these regulations for all community-based day programs by July 1, 1990.(c) Upon the promulgation of regulations pursuant to subdivision (b), and pursuant to Section 4691.5, and by September 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall establish rates pursuant to the regulations. Rate increases during the 1990–91 and 1991–92 fiscal years shall be limited to those specified in subdivision (b). For the 1992–93 fiscal year and all succeeding fiscal years, any increases proposed during those years in the rates of reimbursement established pursuant to the regulations, except for rate increases due to rate appeals and rate adjustments based on unanticipated program changes, shall be subject to the appropriation of sufficient funds in the Budget Act, for those purposes, to fully provide the proposed increase to all eligible programs for the entire fiscal year. If the funds appropriated in the Budget Act are not sufficient to fully provide for the proposed increase in the rates of reimbursement for all eligible programs for the entire fiscal year, the proposed increase shall be limited to the level of funds appropriated. The increases proposed in the rates of reimbursement shall be reduced equitably among all eligible providers in accordance with funds appropriated and the eligible programs shall be reimbursed at the reduced amount for the entire fiscal year.(d) Using the reported costs of day programs reimbursed at a permanent rate and the standards and ratesetting processes promulgated pursuant to subdivision (b) as a basis, the department shall report to the Legislature as follows:(1) By April 15, 1993, and every odd year thereafter, the difference between permanent rates for existing programs and the rates of those programs based upon their allowable costs and client attendance, submitted pursuant to the regulations specified in subdivision (b). In reporting the difference, the department shall also identify the amount of the difference associated with programs whose rates are above the allowable range of rates, which is available for increasing the rates of programs whose rates are below the allowable range, to within the allowable range, and any other pertinent cost or rate information which the department deems necessary.(2) By April 15, 1994, and every even year thereafter, the level of funding, if any, which was not appropriated to reimburse providers at the proposed rates reported the prior fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (1), and any other pertinent cost or rate information which the department deems necessary.(3) The April 15, 1996, report pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be prepared jointly by the department and organizations representing community-based day program providers, as determined by the department. That report shall also include a review of the ratesetting process and recommendations, if any, for its modification.(e) Rates established by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) are exempt from the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(f) The department shall ensure that the regional centers monitor compliance with program standards.(g) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.SEC. 41. Section 4691 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:4691. (a) The Legislature reaffirms its intent that community-based day programs be planned and provided as part of a continuum of services to enable persons with developmental disabilities to approximate the pattern of everyday living available to people of the same age without disabilities. The Legislature further intends that standards be developed to ensure high-quality services, and that equitable ratesetting procedures based upon those standards be established, maintained, and revised, as necessary. The Legislature intends that ratesetting procedures be developed for all community-based day programs, which include adult development centers, activity centers, infant day programs, behavior management programs, social recreational programs, and independent living programs.(b) For the purpose of ensuring that regional centers may secure high-quality services for persons with developmental disabilities, the State Department of Developmental Services shall promulgate regulations establishing program standards and an equitable process for setting rates of state payment for community-based day programs. These regulations shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1) The standards and requirements related to the operation of the program including, but not limited to, staff qualifications, staff-to-client ratios, client entrance and exit criteria, program design, program evaluation, program and client records and documentation, client placement, and personnel requirements and functions.(2) The allowable cost components of the program, including salary and wages, staff benefits, operating expenses, and management organization costs in which two or more programs are operated by a separate and distinct corporation or entity.(3) The rate determination processes for establishing rates, based on the allowable costs of the allowable cost components. Different rate determination processes may be developed for establishing rates for new and existing programs, and for the initial and subsequent years of implementation of the regulations. The processes shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(A) The procedure for identification and grouping of programs by type of day program and approved staff-to-client ratio.(B) The requirements for an identification of the program, cost, and other information, if any, that the program is required to submit to the department or the regional center, the consequences, if any, for failure to do so, and the timeframes and format for submission and review.(C) The ratesetting methodology.(D) A procedure for adjusting rates as a result of anticipated and unanticipated program changes and fiscal audits of the program and a procedure for appealing rates, including the timeframes for the program to request an adjustment or appeal, and for the department to respond.(E) A procedure for increasing established rates and the allowable range of rates due to cost-of-living adjustments.(F) A procedure for increasing established rates as a result of Budget Act appropriations made pursuant to the ratesetting methodology established pursuant to Section 4691.5 and subdivision (c) of this section.The department shall develop these regulations in consultation with representatives from organizations representing the developmental services system as determined by the department. The State Council on Developmental Disabilities, and other organizations representing regional centers, providers, and clients shall have an opportunity to review and comment upon the proposed regulations prior to their promulgation. The department shall promulgate these regulations for all community-based day programs by July 1, 1990.(c) Upon the promulgation of regulations pursuant to subdivision (b), and pursuant to Section 4691.5, and by September 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall establish rates pursuant to the regulations. Rate increases during the 1990–91 and 1991–92 fiscal years shall be limited to those specified in subdivision (b). For the 1992–93 fiscal year and all succeeding fiscal years, any increases proposed during those years in the rates of reimbursement established pursuant to the regulations, except for rate increases due to rate appeals and rate adjustments based on unanticipated program changes, shall be subject to the appropriation of sufficient funds in the Budget Act, for those purposes, to fully provide the proposed increase to all eligible programs for the entire fiscal year. If the funds appropriated in the Budget Act are not sufficient to fully provide for the proposed increase in the rates of reimbursement for all eligible programs for the entire fiscal year, the proposed increase shall be limited to the level of funds appropriated. The increases proposed in the rates of reimbursement shall be reduced equitably among all eligible providers in accordance with funds appropriated and the eligible programs shall be reimbursed at the reduced amount for the entire fiscal year.(d) Rates established by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) are exempt from the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(e) The department shall ensure that the regional centers monitor compliance with program standards.(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.SEC. 42. Section 4731 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4731. (a) Each consumer or any representative acting on behalf of any consumer or consumers, who believes that any right to which a consumer is entitled has been abused, punitively withheld, or improperly or unreasonably denied by a regional center, state-operated facility, or service provider, may pursue a complaint as provided in this section.(b) Initial referral of any complaint taken pursuant to this section shall be to the director of the regional center from which the consumer receives case management services. If the consumer resides in a state-operated facility, the complaint shall be made to the director of the state-operated facility. The director shall, within 20 working days of receiving a complaint, investigate the complaint and send a written proposed resolution to the complainant and, if applicable, to the service provider. The written proposed resolution shall include a telephone number and mailing address for referring the proposed resolution in accordance with subdivision (c).(c) If the complainant is not satisfied with the proposed resolution, the complainant may refer the complaint, in writing, to the Director of Developmental Services within 15 working days of receipt of the proposed resolution. The director shall, within 45 days of receiving a complaint, issue a written administrative decision and send a copy of the decision to the complainant, the director of the regional center or state-operated facility, and the service provider, if applicable. If there is no referral to the department, the proposed resolution shall become effective on the 20th working day following receipt by the complainant.(d) The department shall annually compile the number of complaints filed, by each regional center and state-operated facility, the subject matter of each complaint, and a summary of each decision. Copies shall be made available to any person upon request.(e) This section shall not be used to resolve disputes concerning the nature, scope, or amount of services and supports that should be included in an individual program plan, for which there is an appeals procedure established in this division, or disputes regarding rates or audit appeals for which there is an appeals procedure established in regulations. Those disputes shall be resolved through the appeals procedure established by this division or in regulations.(f) All consumers or, if appropriate, their authorized representative, shall be notified in writing in their preferred language of the right to file a complaint pursuant to this section when they apply for services from a regional center or a state-operated facility, and at each regularly scheduled planning meeting.(g) Any complaint filed prior to February 1, 2027, shall continue to be addressed pursuant to the provisions of this section as it read immediately preceding its repeal by the act that added this subdivision.(h) This section shall become inoperative on February 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.SEC. 43. Section 4851 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4851. The definitions contained in this chapter shall govern the construction of this chapter, with respect to habilitation services provided through the regional center, and unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the following meanings:(a) “Habilitation services” means community-based services purchased or provided for adults with developmental disabilities, including services provided under the Work Activity Program and the Supported Employment Program, to prepare and maintain them at their highest level of vocational functioning, or to prepare them for referral to vocational rehabilitation services.(b) “Individual program plan” means the overall plan developed by a regional center pursuant to Section 4646.(c) “Individual habilitation service plan” means the service plan developed by the habilitation service vendor to meet employment goals in the individual program plan.(d) “Department” means the State Department of Developmental Services.(e) “Work activity program” includes, but is not limited to, sheltered workshops or work activity centers, centers or community-based work activity programs certified pursuant to subdivision (f) or accredited by CARF, the Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities. vendored by a regional center.(f) “Certification” means certification procedures developed by the Department of Rehabilitation.(g) “Work activity program day” means the period of time during which a Work Activity Program provides services to consumers. individuals.(h) “Supported employment program” means a program that meets the requirements of subdivisions (l) to (q), (j) to (o), inclusive.(i) “Consumer” “Individual” means any adult who receives services purchased under this chapter.(j)“Accreditation” means a determination of compliance with the set of standards appropriate to the delivery of services by a work activity program or supported employment program, developed by CARF, the Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities, and applied by the commission or the department.(k)“CARF” means the Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities.(l)(j) “Supported employment” means paid work that is integrated in the community for individuals with developmental disabilities.(m)(k) “Integrated work” means the engagement of an employee with a disability in work in a setting typically found in the community in which individuals interact with individuals without disabilities other than those who are providing services to those individuals, to the same extent that individuals without disabilities in comparable positions interact with other persons.(n)(l) “Supported employment placement” means the employment of an individual with a developmental disability by an employer in the community, directly or through contract with a supported employment program. This includes provision of ongoing support services necessary for the individual to retain employment.(o)(m) “Allowable supported employment services” means the services approved in the individual program plan and specified in the individual habilitation service plan for the purpose of achieving supported employment as an outcome, and may include any of the following:(1) Job development, to the extent authorized by the regional center.(2) Program staff time for conducting job analysis of supported employment opportunities for a specific consumer. individual.(3) Program staff time for the direct supervision or training of a consumer or consumers an individual while they engage in integrated work unless other arrangements for consumer individual supervision, including, but not limited to, employer supervision reimbursed by the supported employment program, are approved by the regional center.(4) Community-based training in adaptive functional and social skills necessary to ensure job adjustment and retention.(5) Counseling with a consumer’s an individual’s significant other to ensure support of a consumer an individual in job adjustment.(6) Advocacy or intervention on behalf of a consumer an individual to resolve problems affecting the consumer’s individual’s work adjustment or retention.(7) Ongoing support services needed to ensure the consumer’s maximize the individual’s retention of the job.(p)(n) “Group services” means job coaching in a group supported employment placement at a job coach-to-consumer coach-to-individual ratio of not less than 1 to 2 nor more than 1 to 8 where services to a minimum of two consumers individuals are funded by the regional center or the Department of Rehabilitation. For consumers individuals receiving group services, job coaching shall be provided at the worksite.(q)(o) “Individualized services” means job coaching and other supported employment services for regional center-funded consumers individuals in a supported employment placement at a job coach-to-consumer coach-to-individual ratio of 1 to 1, and that decrease over time until stabilization is achieved. Individualized services may be provided on or off the jobsite.SEC. 44. Section 4856 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4856. (a) The regional center shall monitor, evaluate, and audit habilitation services providers for program effectiveness, using performance criteria that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1) Service quality.(2) Protections for individuals receiving services.(3) Compliance with applicable CARF standards. service standards established by the department. The department shall, in consultation with regional centers, providers, and other stakeholders, establish the service standards no later than September 1, 2027. The service standards shall be designed to promote the provision of quality services that enhance individual outcomes while maintaining compliance with federal requirements. From September 2026 until September 2027, the department shall update the Legislature quarterly on progress toward establishment of the service standards, including any considerations or concerns raised by regional centers, providers, and the community.(b) (1) The regional center may impose immediate sanctions on providers of work activity programs and supported employment programs for noncompliance with accreditation or services service standards contained in regulations adopted by the department, and for safety violations which that pose a threat to consumers individuals of habilitation services.(2) Sanctions include, but are not limited to, any of the following:(A) A moratorium on new referrals.(B) Imposition of a corrective plan as specified in regulations.(C) Removal of consumers individuals from a service area where dangerous conditions or abusive conditions exist.(D) Termination of vendorization.(c) A moratorium on new referrals may be the first formal sanction to be taken except in instances where consumers in which individuals are at imminent risk of abuse or other harm. When the regional center determines a moratorium on new referrals to be the first formal sanction, a corrective action plan shall be developed. The moratorium shall be lifted only when the conditions cited are corrected per a corrective action plan.(d) A corrective action plan is a formal sanction, that may be imposed either simultaneously with a moratorium on new referrals, or as a single sanction in circumstances that do not require a moratorium, as determined by the regional center. Noncompliance with the conditions and timelines of the corrective action plan shall result in termination of vendorization.(e) Removal of consumers individuals from a program shall only take place where only when dangerous or abusive conditions are present, or upon termination of vendorization. In instances of removal for health and safety reasons, when the corrections are made by the program, as determined adequate by the regional center, consumers individuals may return, at their option.(f) Any A provider sanctioned under subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) may request an administrative review review, as specified in Section 4648.1.(g) Any A provider sanctioned under subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall have a right to a formal review by the Office of Administrative Hearings under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(h) Effective July 1, 2004, if a habilitation services provider is under sanction under former Section 19354.5, the provider shall complete the requirements of the corrective action plan or any other terms or conditions imposed upon it as part of the sanctions. At the end of the term of the corrective action plan or other compliance requirements, the services provider shall be evaluated by the regional center based upon the requirements in this section.SEC. 45. Section 4861 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4861. The A regional center may vendor a new work activity or supported employment programs, program after determining the capacity of the program to deliver effective services, and assessing the ability of the program to comply with CARF requirements. services and meet the requirements specified in subdivision (a) of Section 4856.(a) Programs that receive the regional center’s approval to provide supported employment services shall receive rates in accordance with Section 4860.(b) A new work activity program shall receive the rate posted on the department’s internet website.(c)The regional center may purchase services from new work activity programs and supported employment programs, even though the program in not yet accredited by CARF, if all of the following apply:(1)The vendor can demonstrate that the program is in compliance with certification standards established by the Department of Rehabilitation, to allow a period for becoming CARF accredited.(2)(A)The program commits, in writing, to apply for accreditation by CARF within three years of the approval to purchase services by the regional center.(B)CARF shall accredit a program within four years after the program has been vendored.(d)(c) The regional center may approve or disapprove proposals submitted by new or existing vendors based on all of the following criteria criteria, to the extent that it is federally permissible:(1) The need for a work activity or supported employment program.(2) The capacity of the vendor to deliver work activity or supported employment services effectively.(3) The ability of the vendor to comply with the requirements of this section. section and Section 4856.(4) The ability of the vendor to achieve integrated paid work for consumers individuals served in supported employment.SEC. 46. Section 4865 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:4865. At the request of the Department of Rehabilitation, a work activity or supported employment program or both program, or both, shall release accreditation and state licensing reports and consumer individual special incident reports reports, as required by law or regulations regulations, in instances of suspected abuse.SEC. 47. Section 4868.6 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:4868.6. (a) The department and the Department of Rehabilitation shall develop an interagency agreement, with respect to the delivery of habilitation services and vocational rehabilitation programs, to create an integrated employment services system between the Department of Rehabilitation and regional centers, with the goals of having each individual experience uninterrupted services, minimized handoffs, and fewer barriers, and increase timely access to employment. The interagency agreement shall outline an integrated employment services system to develop opportunities for, and increase access to, competitive integrated employment for individuals that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(1) A dual provider process for employment providers between the Department of Rehabilitation and regional centers.(2) Clear funding paths between the department, the Department of Rehabilitation, and regional centers to enable timely employment services access for each individual seeking employment.(3) A process to make employment supports and services leading to competitive integrated employment seamless to the individual, regardless of which department an individual seeks supports from or which department funds the services.(b) The department and the Department of Rehabilitation shall develop the interagency agreement no later than August 1, 2027.(c) The department and the Department of Rehabilitation shall develop the integrated employment services system with input from the community no later than March 1, 2029. Input from the community shall include, but not be limited to, consultation with the department’s Lived Experience Advisory Group, individuals and families, caregivers, advocates and associations, service providers, regional centers, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, the State Rehabilitation Council, and legislative staff.(d) Beginning December 1, 2026, the department shall semiannually report milestones on the development of the integrated employment services system on the department’s internet website until the integrated employment services system is developed.(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Dual provider process” means an aligned vendorization process for supported employment programs between regional centers and the Department of Rehabilitation.(2) “Clear funding path” means an outline that defines funding obligations between regional centers and the Department of Rehabilitation for the different services used for an individual to achieve competitive integrated employment.SEC. 48. Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4890) is added to Division 4.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read: CHAPTER 16. Grievance Process4890. For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Authorized representative” has the same meaning as in Section 4701.(b) “Case file” means information or documentation provided by the grievant, and information or documentation considered, relied upon, and generated by the regional center or state-operated facility related to the grievance.(c) “Day” means a calendar day.(d) (1) “Grievance” means either of the following:(A) An expression of dissatisfaction related to the regional center, service provider, or state-operated facility’s performance of the activities described in Section 441.301(c)(1) to 441.301(c)(6) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations or an individual’s rights described in Sections 4502, 4502.1 and 4503.(B) A belief that, for a person described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), a right described in Sections 4502, 4502.1, or 4503 has been abused, punitively withheld, or improperly or unreasonably denied by a regional center, service provider, or state-operated facility.(2) For the purposes of this chapter, “grievance” does not include disagreements regarding eligibility for and the provision of services to which Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4700) applies, or regarding rates or audit appeals for which there is an appeals procedure established in regulations. This chapter does not limit rights under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4700).(e) “Grievance reviewer” means an individual with subject matter expertise related to the grievance who reviews the grieved issue, including information submitted by grievant, and who was not involved in the situation or decisionmaking that resulted in the grievance, or a subordinate of a person so involved.(f) “Grievant” means a person who files a grievance pursuant to this chapter and who meets any of the following descriptions:(1) An individual with a developmental or intellectual disability who has applied for, been determined to be eligible to receive, or receives services from a regional center or a state-operated facility.(2) The authorized representative of a person described in paragraph (1).(3) (A) Any other individual who files a grievance pursuant to this chapter, with the prior written consent of a person described in paragraph (1) or (2), which meets the requirements for the release of information under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act Privacy Rule in Part 164 (commencing with Section 164.102) of Subchapter C of Subtitle A of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(B) A service provider shall not file a grievance that would be a conflict of interest, as established by the department.(g) “Preferred language” means the language preferred by the grievant.(h) “Resolution plan” means a written summary of the grievance investigation and actions to be taken by a regional center, service provider, or state-operated facility to address the grievance and includes all of the following:(1) A general description of the reason for the grievance.(2) The date the grievance was received.(3) The date of each grievance review or, if applicable, grievance review meeting.(4) The resolution of the grievance, as applicable.(5) The date of resolution of the grievance, if applicable.(6) The name of the individual with a developmental or intellectual disability who has applied for, been determined to be eligible to receive, or actually receives, services from a regional center or a state-operated facility for whom the grievance was filed.(i) “Retaliatory action” minimally means an adverse action, threat, intimidation, coercion, or harassment, and as a definition is subject to further development pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 4894.4891. (a) A grievant desiring to file a grievance shall submit the grievance to the department. A grievance may be submitted online, orally, or in writing by the grievant in accordance with this chapter. Upon receipt of a grievance, the grievant shall receive an acknowledgment from the department of its receipt.(b) All applicants or individuals eligible for services, or if appropriate, their authorized representative, shall be notified in writing in their preferred language of the right to submit a grievance pursuant to this chapter from the regional center or state-operated facility upon intake or when an individual program plan is developed or modified, or upon request. The written notice shall, in plain language, explain the difference between the grievance process under this chapter and appeals regarding eligibility and service issues that are appropriate for the state hearing process pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 4710) of Chapter 7.(c) Upon request, the department and regional centers shall provide grievants with reasonable assistance in completing forms, taking procedural steps, and appropriately filing a grievance with the department.(d)  The department shall do all of the following within five days of receiving a grievance submission:(1) Review the submission to determine if it meets the definition of a grievance pursuant to this chapter.(2) If the submission meets the definition of a grievance pursuant to this chapter, the department shall refer the grievance to the associated regional center or state-operated facility to address.(3) If the submission contains an indication of serious harm or risk of serious harm to an individual, the department shall expedite a referral to the regional center or state-operated facility for appropriate action.(4) If the submission does not meet the definition of a grievance pursuant to this chapter, the department shall promptly provide reasonable assistance to redirect the matter to other appropriate processes or entities to further pursue the matter.(e) Regional centers, state-operated facilities, and service providers shall not take punitive or retaliatory action or threat of action against a grievant, an individual served, an authorized representative, a witness, or any person who assists in or participates in a grievance under this chapter.(f) Upon receipt of a grievance, the regional center or state-operated facility shall assign a grievance reviewer, with priority for review if the department determined there is an indication of serious harm or risk of serious harm to the individual pursuant to subdivision (d). The regional center or state-operated facility shall provide the grievant a reasonable opportunity, face-to-face including through the use of audio or video technology, or in writing, to present evidence, information, or testimony and make legal and factual arguments related to their grievance.(g) The grievant shall be provided a copy of, or access to, the case file by the regional center or state-operated facility free of charge and within three business days from the date the grievance was referred by the department. If the grievant requests access to the consumer records outside of the case file specific to their grievance, they may request access pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 4725) of Chapter 7.(h) The regional center or state-operated facility’s grievance reviewer shall review the grievance and send a resolution plan to the grievant, the department, and, if named in the grievance, the service provider. The regional center or state-operated facility’s grievance reviewer shall produce and sign the resolution plan within 60 days of the date that the grievance was referred by the department.(i) Resolutions included in the resolution plan shall be reasonably appropriate to resolve the grievance, and, if appropriate, prevent reoccurrence. Resolutions may include, but are not limited to, convening the individual program planning team, ongoing communication or meetings with the regional center or state-operated facility, completion of any identified steps in the resolution plan, requiring corrective action, including training, policy or implementation changes, reporting or supervision necessary to prevent recurrence, or a statement regarding the outcome of an investigation of alleged noncompliance with the home- and community-based settings rules.(j) The department, regional center, or state-operated facility may extend the timeframe specified in subdivision (h) up to 14 days if the grievant requests the extension or if the department, regional center, or state-operated facility documents that there is need for additional information and how the delay is in the grievant’s best interest. If the department, regional center, or state-operated facility extends the timeframe not at the request of the individual or grievant, it shall do both of the following:(1) Make reasonable efforts to give the grievant prompt oral notice of the delay.(2) Within two days of determining that there is a need for a delay, but no later than 60 days from receipt of the grievance, give the grievant written notice of the reason for the decision to extend the timeframe.(k) A grievant who is not satisfied with the regional center’s or state-operated facility’s resolution plan may request a review by the department within 15 days of receiving the resolution plan. An extension for good cause may be granted by the department, as defined in department directive or regulations.(l) If a review is requested pursuant to subdivision (k), the department shall review the resolution plan for relative appropriateness to the grievance and, within 21 days, shall notify the grievant, regional center or state-operated facility, and, if named in the grievance, the service provider, of its determination. The department’s determination may affirm the resolution plan, remand the matter to the regional center or state-operated facility with written instructions for any necessary revision, or require one or more corrective actions consistent with the intent and provisions of this chapter.(m) The department shall annually review a sample of resolution plans for each regional center and state-operated facility.(n) (1) The department shall annually post the deidentified results of the review described in subdivision (m) on its internet website.(2) The department shall use the review to determine operational or systemic problems within a regional center, state-operated facility, or internal to the department. The department shall identify and implement options to address identified issues, which may include, but are not limited to, providing technical assistance or training to regional centers or state-operated facilities, requiring corrective action plans with measurable outcomes and timelines, conducting monitoring or audit activities, or identifying potential policy changes. If the department identifies repeated failures to cure or meaningfully respond to substantially similar grievances, the department may, in its discretion, take additional action consistent with subdivision (d) of Section 4629.(3) The department’s review and use of grievance data pursuant to this section is independent of, and in addition to, the resolution of any individual grievance. The department may initiate monitoring, oversight, or enforcement actions under this section regardless of how a particular grievance was resolved.(o) The department shall annually post, at a minimum, all of the following information on its internet website:(1) The number of grievances received by the department annually.(2) The average number of days for each regional center or state-operated facility to respond to grievances.(3) The number of grievances that resulted in a request for department review.(4) The percentages of grievances that were resolved in favor of the grievant, the entity about whom the grievance was filed, or some combination thereof.(5) The number and type of grievances that resulted in the department providing the regional center or state-operated facility technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (n).4892. (a) The department shall convene stakeholders and legislative staff no later than August 1, 2027, in order to receive input and feedback regarding the implementation of this chapter.(b) (1) The department shall submit a report to the Legislature on the implementation of this chapter, including stakeholder input received pursuant to subdivision (a), no later than December 1, 2027.(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(c) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2028.4893. This chapter applies to any grievance filed on or after February 1, 2027. Any complaint filed prior to February 1, 2027, shall continue to be addressed pursuant to the provisions of Section 4731, as it read immediately preceding its becoming inoperative by the act that added this section.4894. (a) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of written directives or similar instructions, after consultation with individuals, families, caregivers, service providers, regional centers, and advocates. These directives and instructions shall maintain compliance with federal requirements and guidance issued by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and, prior to the adoption of regulations, shall consider all of the following:(1) Procedures for department screening of grievances, including redirection to the appropriate process when a submission is not a grievance, and safeguards to ensure that matters subject to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4700) are not improperly diverted from the appeals process.(2) Procedures for identifying grievances involving serious harm, risk of serious harm, and for requiring timely interim action when necessary to protect the health, safety, rights, or community living of the individuals.(3) Standards for access to the grievance case file, including timely access, accessible formats, and identification of information considered, relied upon, or generated in connection with the grievance.(4) Standards for department review of resolution plans, including factors the department shall consider in determining if a resolution plan is appropriate to the grievance.(5) Procedures for corrective action, monitoring, technical assistance, and other actions necessary to address repeated or systemic violations.(6) Standards for identifying and addressing conflicts of interest, including conflicts involving service providers who file or assist with grievances, regional center or state-operated facility staff who review grievances, and department staff who review resolution plans.(7) Standards to implement subdivision (e) of Section 4891, including a definition of retaliation, examples of prohibited retaliation or threats of retaliation, procedures for preventing and responding to retaliation, and interim protections and corrective actions available when retaliation is alleged or substantiated.(8) A definition of good cause for an individual to request review by the department more than 15 days following receipt of a resolution plan pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 4891.(b) These written directives or similar instructions shall be valid until regulations are adopted, which shall occur no later than January 31, 2030.SEC. 49. Section 53 of Chapter 171 of the Statutes of 2001 is repealed.SEC. 53.The State Department of Developmental Services shall provide the fiscal committees of the Legislature with copies of finalized data analyses, including statistical analyses of variances and results of data survey work, conducted as part of the second phase of the Purchases of Services Study to be completed in 2002.SEC. 50. Section 70 of Chapter 758 of the Statutes of 2008 is repealed.SEC. 70.The State Department of Developmental Services shall provide an update to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature during the fall legislative interim on an annual basis, beginning in the 2008–09 fiscal year, regarding the impact of the adopted freezes and various cost containment measures on clients and service levels. The policy committees of the Legislature may choose to hold informational hearings on these issues to further review and explore the prioritization and levels at which a cost containment measure or measures may be proposed for modification or elimination and shall report these findings for consideration in the annual subcommittee budget process or in legislation, where appropriate.SEC. 51. Section 19 of Chapter 26 of the Statutes of 2016 is repealed.SEC. 19.(a)The State Department of Developmental Services shall report quarterly to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee the estimated amount of General Fund expenditures used to backfill federal funding as a result of the decertification of intermediate care facility units at the Sonoma Developmental Center.(b)If the intermediate care facility units at the Fairview Developmental Center or the Porterville Developmental Center are decertified by the federal government in the 2016–17 fiscal year, the State Department of Developmental Services shall report quarterly to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee the estimated amount of General Fund expenditures used to backfill federal funding as a result of the decertification or decertifications.SEC. 52. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030:(a) Up to $1,200,000 in Program 4140015-Operations in Item 4300-101-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) for activities related to Local Volunteer Advisory Committees.(b) Up to $1,400,000 in Program 4140015-Operations in Item 4300-101-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for activities related to Local Volunteer Advisory Committees.(c) Up to $1,700,000 in Program 4140015-Operations in Item 4300-101-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025) for activities related to Local Volunteer Advisory Committees.SEC. 53. This act is a bill providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution, has been identified as related to the budget in the Budget Bill, and shall take effect immediately.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact statutory changes relating to the Budget Act of 2025.